Comprehensive Roadmap to Mastering Reaper
(DAW) for Complete Beginners
Introduction: This roadmap provides a step-by-step learning path for a complete beginner to become
proficient in all key areas of music production using Reaper. The journey is organized into stages that
build progressively on skills – from initial setup and recording through mixing, mastering, and advanced
customization. At each stage, the emphasis is on hands-on learning: you will be encouraged to practice
with real projects and exercises rather than just read or watch. A tip from experienced users is to
dedicate time to experiment in Reaper with the user manual or forum at hand to search for answers as
you go . Also, focus on learning only what you need at each step – don’t try to absorb all of
Reaper’s features at once . Reaper is extremely deep and customizable, but you will gradually realize
how features you skipped initially can become useful later. Remember to have fun during the process
and don’t fear making mistakes – every project (even ones you scrap) builds your experience . With
that mindset, let’s dive into the roadmap.
Stage 1: Installation, Setup, and Basic Orientation
In this first stage, you will get Reaper up and running, configure essential settings, and become familiar
with the user interface. The goal is to ensure your system is ready for audio work and that you know the
basic controls and terminology before diving into recording.
Core Topics:
- Installing Reaper and Licensing: Download and install the latest version of Reaper from the official
site (the free trial is fully functional ). Learn how the licensing works (e.g. $60 discounted license for
personal/small business use ).
- Audio Interface Setup: Connect and configure your audio interface (or built-in sound card). In
Reaper’s Options > Preferences > Audio > Device, select your interface as the input/output and choose
the appropriate driver (ASIO on Windows for low latency) . Adjust buffer size and sample rate for
a balance between low latency and stable performance . The official Reaper resources include
guides on using an audio interface and optimizing latency .
- Reaper Workspace Overview: Familiarize yourself with Reaper’s interface: the main timeline/
arrange view, the Track Control Panel (where track controls like volume, pan, record-arm are located
on the left), the Mixer (typically at the bottom, showing channel strips for tracks), and the transport bar
(play, stop, record controls). Notice that Reaper’s tracks are “universal” – any track can hold audio or
MIDI or video and can act as input, bus, etc., giving great flexibility .
- Basic Navigation and UI Operations: Learn how to create a new project and save it. Practice adding a
track (e.g. double-click in the left pane or use Insert > New Track ), naming tracks, and using basic
transport controls (play, stop, record). Toggle the metronome on/off and adjust tempo. Also learn how
to zoom, scroll, and toggle views (for instance, the mixer view). This stage is about getting comfortable
moving around in Reaper’s environment.
- Key Interface Elements: Identify the main buttons on a track’s control panel: Record Arm (enables
recording on that track) , Mute/Solo, Volume fader/knob, Pan knob, FX (to add plugins) , Route
(for sends and routing) , and the Envelopes/Automation button . Understanding these will
prepare you for deeper tasks later.
1
2
3
4
5 6
7 8
9
10
11
12
13 14
14 15
1
Practical Exercises:
- Install and Configure: Install Reaper and open it. Go to Preferences and configure your audio device.
Try playing back any existing audio on your computer through Reaper (for example, drag-and-drop an
audio file onto Reaper’s track area to import it, then play). This checks that your audio output is
working.
- Explore the Interface: Create a new project. Add two new tracks. Try renaming one track “Guitar” and
the other “Vocals” (double-click the track name area to rename). Arm one track for recording (click the
record-arm button – it should turn red). Although we won’t record just yet, notice how the meters react
to input if you have a mic connected and enabled. Toggle the metronome and observe the count-in.
Adjust the master volume and see its effect on playback.
- Basic Navigation: Practice using the scroll wheel or trackpad to zoom in/out on the timeline. Move the
edit cursor around by clicking different timeline positions. If you imported an audio file, practice
scrolling and zooming around it. Try using the spacebar to play/stop and Home/End keys to go to
project start/end. These small navigation skills will make the next stages easier.
- Project Management: Save your project (use File > Save Project As…). Observe that Reaper can save all
media in a specific folder if you check “Copy all media into project directory” – a good habit to keep
projects organized. No need to master everything now, just be aware of how to save and reopen
projects.
Useful Resources:
- Official Reaper User Guide (Quick Start): The user guide’s quick-start chapter is very helpful for
beginners, explaining common tasks step-by-step. It covers many basics like configuring devices and
adding tracks .
- Reaper Official Video Guides: On the Reaper website under Resources > Videos, there are beginnerfriendly videos. For example, “This is REAPER 7: Starting a New Project” and “The Tracks” introduce the
interface and track creation . These are created by Kenny Gioia and are clear and concise.
- “How to Set Up Your Audio Interface in Reaper” Tutorials: Many free videos (e.g. on YouTube) walk
through interface setup and preferences. Search for your specific interface model + “Reaper setup” if
available. The Reaper Blog and other channels often have guidance on optimizing audio settings.
- Reaper.fm Forums and Communities: If you run into trouble (no sound, or weird behavior), the
official Cockos Reaper forum is extremely friendly and helpful . Don’t hesitate to ask basic questions
there – the community is known for being supportive of beginners.
Optional Advanced Topics (for later):
(You do not need to master these now, but keep these in mind to explore as you become more comfortable.)
- Customizing Layouts: Reaper allows you to customize window layouts and even undock sections of
the interface. Down the line, you can explore the View > Screensets/Layout menu to create workspaces
that suit different tasks (e.g. separate layouts for recording vs. mixing) .
- Configuring Themes: Reaper’s look can be changed with user-created themes. You might later try
installing a popular Reaper theme that you find visually appealing or clearer. This can make the
interface more enjoyable and personalized .
- Import/Export Configurations: As you tweak settings, know that Reaper can import/export
configuration files (found in Preferences). Advanced users back up their configs or import custom ones
– an optional idea once you have your environment just right.
- Portable Install: Reaper can run as a portable installation (from a USB drive or separate folder) .
This is useful if you want to test new settings or run Reaper on different computers without reinstalling
– a fun thing to try later.
16
17
18
19
20
21
2
Stage 2: Audio Recording Fundamentals
Now that you have Reaper set up and know your way around the basics, it’s time to start recording
audio. This stage focuses on recording techniques and workflow: setting up tracks for recording,
capturing performances, and basic management of recorded audio files. By the end of this stage, you
should be able to record instruments or vocals in Reaper and have an understanding of how takes and
monitoring work.
Core Topics:
- Track Setup for Recording: Learn how to prepare a track for recording audio. This includes arming the
track (record-enable it) and selecting the correct input (e.g. Input 1 for your microphone, Input 2 for
guitar, etc., depending on your audio interface). Ensure you understand mono vs. stereo input selection
if applicable.
- Input Monitoring: Understand how to enable input monitoring so you can hear yourself through the
DAW while recording (the little speaker icon next to the record arm). You can choose to monitor the
input without recording as well (by setting record mode to “Monitor only”) . Be mindful of latency – if
there is a delay echo, you may need to lower your audio buffer size for real-time playing.
- Setting Levels: Before recording, always check your input levels. Use the track’s meter to ensure your
signal is not too low (which could introduce noise) and not clipping (going into the red). Aim for a
healthy level (e.g. peaks around -12 dBFS) to allow headroom. This concept is fundamental in all DAWs.
- Using the Metronome and Count-in: If you are recording music, you’ll likely use the metronome (click
track) to keep time. Learn how to toggle the metronome and set a count-in (under Options > Metronome/
Pre-roll settings). If the default metronome sound is unpleasant, know that you can customize it or even
replace it with a different sound later , though this is optional.
- Basic Recording Process: The workflow to record is: arm track -> position cursor -> press Record ->
perform -> press Stop. Practice this cycle. Learn that when you stop, Reaper will prompt to save or
delete the recording (you can configure this in preferences if you want to auto-save). Understand where
recorded files are stored (by default in the project directory or a default path).
- Recording Modes (Takes and Overdubs): Reaper by default records each pass as a “take” in the same
item if you record over an existing item. Get a basic idea of how takes work: you can cycle through takes
on a track, or later “explode” takes to separate tracks. Also know you can change recording mode to
record into new separate tracks or use the new “layered” recording mode for comping . This is a
more advanced detail; initially you might just do single takes, but be aware multiple takes are possible.
- File Management: It’s good to create a habit of naming tracks before recording (so that recorded files
get named accordingly). Also, note that you can set up paths for recorded files per project or have
Reaper generate subfolders for you. While optional, these practices keep recordings organized
especially as you start doing multi-track recordings.
Practical Exercises:
- Record a Test Audio Clip: Plug in a microphone or instrument to your interface. In Reaper, add a track,
arm it, and select the correct input. Press record and capture about 15-30 seconds of audio – for
example, speak a few lines or play some notes on your instrument. Press stop. Play back what you
recorded to ensure it sounds clear and at a good level.
- Multiple Takes: On the same track, try recording another take over the first (ensure Options > New
recordings that overlap existing media items is set to splits takes or creates new take – the default). For
instance, record yourself saying “Take 1…[line]”, then again “Take 2…[line]”. Notice how Reaper handles
the two takes in one item (you’ll see take numbers). Practice switching takes: select the item and press
T (default shortcut) or right-click and choose Take > Switch to take.... This will familiarize you with the
concept of takes for later comping.
- Punch-In Recording (Optional): If you feel adventurous, try a basic punch-in: enable Options > Record
Mode: Time Selection Auto-Punch. Highlight a short section on the timeline (time selection) and record –
22
23 24
25
3
Reaper will only record during that selected range, allowing you to “punch in” a fix in the middle of a
performance. This is optional but demonstrates Reaper’s flexible recording modes.
- Organize and Save: After recording, save your project. Note how Reaper prompts to save recorded
files if you hadn’t saved the project first. It’s often wise to save a project before heavy recording and
check File > Project Settings to ensure WAV format and a reasonable sample rate/bit depth (44.1 kHz 24-
bit is a good default). As a mini-project, try creating a folder for a “Test Project”, save the project there,
and record a couple of files so you can inspect that folder to see your recorded WAV files. This helps you
understand where your takes live on disk.
Project Idea: “Personal Podcast/Diary” – Set up a project to record a short “podcast” style diary entry or a
musical riff each day for a week. Each day, add a new track or use new takes on the same track. This
project will motivate you to open Reaper regularly, record something, save the project, and by the end,
you’ll be comfortable with the basic recording workflow and managing takes (and you’ll have an
interesting log of your progress!). This low-stakes project is just for you – no pressure on perfection.
Useful Resources:
- Kenny Gioia’s “Recording Audio in Reaper” Videos: The official Reaper video series has dedicated
tutorials on recording. In This is REAPER 7, check out “Recording Audio – Part 1” and “Part 2”, which
demonstrate arming tracks, input settings, and capturing takes . Seeing the process can greatly
reinforce what you practice.
- Pro Mix Academy – How to Record in Reaper (Blog Post): This step-by-step guide walks
through setting up an interface and the recording process, reiterating many steps above (in case you
need another explanation). It covers configuring audio preferences, arming tracks, and even basic
troubleshooting.
- Reaper User Guide – Recording Chapter: The user manual has a comprehensive chapter on
recording, including punch-in, loop recording, and takes. Use it as reference if you want to learn what
else is possible. It’s very detailed, so you can skim for the parts you need (e.g. search “punch in” or
“takes”).
- Community Videos (Reaper Blog, etc.): There are many community-made videos about recording
techniques in Reaper. For example, the Reaper Blog on YouTube has a “Recording 101” type video. If you
prefer video learning, these can be useful.
- Forums for Troubleshooting: If you encounter issues like “I can’t hear my input” or “My recording is
delayed,” a quick search on the Reaper forum or subreddit often reveals solutions (e.g. enabling Record
Monitoring or adjusting latency). The Reaper.fm forums are a great place to ask for help if something
isn’t working right .
Optional Advanced Topics (for later):
- Advanced Recording Modes: Reaper has loop recording (recording in a looped section, generating
multiple takes automatically) and auto-punch recording (dropping in only during selection). Once you’re
comfortable with basic recording, you can explore these modes to record more efficiently. They are
great for tracking difficult parts that require multiple tries or overdubbing sections in the middle of a
take.
- Comping Takes: Later, learn about Reaper’s comping workflow – especially with the introduction of
track “lanes” in newer Reaper versions (the “record to layers” feature) . This allows you to record
multiple takes in parallel lanes and easily cut between them to compile a perfect take. It’s an essential
skill if you record vocals or solos and want to piece together the best parts of each take.
- SWS Extensions – Auto Color for Tracks: An SWS extension feature (discussed in Stage 10) can autocolor tracks when you arm them or based on names . This can be a nice organizational aid once
you start doing larger recordings. It’s not vital now but worth noting for the future when your projects
grow.
- Recording Multiple Sources Simultaneously: Eventually, you might record a band or multiple inputs
26
27 28
18
25
29 22
4
at once. Reaper can easily handle multi-track simultaneous recording. Down the line, practice creating
multiple tracks, arming all of them, and recording (for example, record guitar and vocals on separate
tracks at the same time). Just ensure you’ve set each track’s input correctly. This will prepare you for
bigger sessions.
Stage 3: Audio Editing and Arrangement Basics
After recording audio, the next fundamental skill is editing: shaping your raw recordings into a tighter,
polished form. In this stage, you’ll learn how to cut, move, and arrange audio items on the timeline.
You’ll also practice basic arrangements, such as looping sections and working with regions of your
project. The goal is to be comfortable manipulating audio clips and assembling a song or project
structure.
Core Topics:
- Navigating and Selecting Items: Understand how audio recordings appear as items on tracks. Learn
to select items (single click) and use time selection (click-drag on the timeline ruler) to choose ranges.
Mastering selection is key to editing precisely.
- Basic Editing Tools: Reaper’s default editing is very mouse-friendly. Key operations include: Split (cut
an item at a point, default shortcut S ), Trim (drag item edges to shorten or extend, if looping is
enabled), and Delete (remove an item or a portion). Practice splitting a long recording into smaller
phrases or removing silence. Also try creating fades: drag the top corners of an item to fade in/out.
These basics let you remove mistakes and smooth transitions.
- Moving and Arranging Items: Click and drag items to move them along the timeline or between
tracks. Hold Ctrl (Windows) or Option (Mac) while dragging to copy an item. This way, you can
duplicate a chorus or repeat a beat easily. Learn snapping behavior: with Snap enabled (magnet icon),
your edits will snap to grid lines (like measures/beats) which is useful for music. Toggle snap off if you
need freeform editing.
- Using the Grid and Looping: If you’re working on music, set the project tempo and grid (e.g. quarter
notes, etc.). Import or record a drum loop and see how it aligns with the grid. Learn to loop an item:
position your mouse at the item’s edge and drag while holding Alt (Windows) or Option (Mac) – the
item will repeat (loop) instead of stretching. Alternatively, split out one bar of a drum loop and copypaste it multiple times.
- Ripple Editing: Discover ripple editing modes (on the main toolbar or Options menu). Ripple editing
moves subsequent items when you insert or remove a section, which is useful for maintaining sync
when arranging. For example, if you cut a 4-bar section out of all tracks, ripple editing can automatically
close that gap. Start with Ripple All Tracks mode in a test project to see how removing an item causes
later items to slide earlier. This is optional at first, but knowing it exists will help you when doing more
complex arrangements.
- Regions and Markers: Begin using markers (press M during playback to drop a marker) to label
sections (like “Intro”, “Verse”, etc.). Also try creating a region: select a time range and press Shift+R –
a region can be moved as a block (with all content in that range) which is very useful for arranging song
sections. These tools make it easier to visualize and rearrange a song structure.
- Basic Tempo Adjustments: As a simple introduction to tempo and time-stretch, experiment with item
playback rate. Hold Alt and drag an item edge to time-stretch it (make it play slower or faster) –
ensure Preserve pitch is on in item properties if you don’t want it to change pitch. This can be useful to fit
a loop to your project tempo. (This is a minor topic – don’t worry if it’s too much at once.)
Practical Exercises:
- Trimming and Cleaning a Voice Clip: Take the voice/instrument recording from Stage 2. Practice
5
editing it: remove any dead air at the start or end by clicking and dragging the item edges (trim), or by
splitting ( S ) at the desired cut points and deleting the unwanted parts. Add a short fade-in at the very
beginning and fade-out at the end to avoid clicks. This will teach you how to clean up a raw recording.
- Loop Editing Exercise: Download a short drum loop (one or two bars of drums) in WAV format. Import
it into Reaper (drag it onto a track). Make sure the project tempo matches the loop’s tempo (or vice
versa). Now practice slicing and rearranging it: for example, split the loop at each beat or bar. Rearrange
the order of a couple of slices, or copy one beat you like and replace another with it. Try looping the
modified loop by duplicating it several times. This exercise builds skill in rhythmic editing and is actually
quite fun .
- Arrange a Simple Song Structure: If you have some musical recordings (or use the provided drum
loop and perhaps record a simple guitar or piano part), practice arranging them. For instance, duplicate
a chorus section to appear twice, or shorten a solo section from 16 bars to 8 bars by cutting out a
portion. Use markers to label “Chorus 1”, “Chorus 2”, and so on. If you’re unsure what to arrange, you
might take a simple 12-bar blues structure: record 12 bars of something, then duplicate it to have a
second chorus, etc., adding markers for each chorus. The focus is on learning to copy/move items to
build a larger structure.
- Experiment with Ripple Edit: Make a test project with two or three tracks (e.g. drum loop on one, a
recorded melody on another). Turn on Ripple Editing (All Tracks) – the icon with two arrows on the
toolbar. Split and delete a section in one track and watch the other track’s item also move to close the
gap . This shows how you can delete an entire song section across all tracks easily. Then undo and
try inserting (copy-paste) a section with ripple on, to see everything move. Knowing this prevents a
common newbie mistake of messing up alignment when cutting sections.
Useful Resources:
- Official Reaper Videos – Editing Basics: Kenny Gioia has videos like “Basic Audio Editing” in the This is
REAPER 7 series which demonstrates splits, fades, and item moves. There’s also “Did you lose your
record, play, stop buttons” – not directly editing, but a fun one in the Start Here section if your interface
ever seems to glitch . It’s good to watch the editing one to visually see how to split and adjust items.
- Reaper Blog Tutorials: The Reaper Blog (unofficial) has many tutorials on editing. Search for terms
like “Reaper editing tips” or check their YouTube for topics on comping, ripple editing, and using the
arrange view efficiently. They often share useful shortcut tips too.
- ReaPack Scripts for Editing (Advanced Users): As you progress, know that the Reaper community
has scripts (via ReaPack) to speed up editing tasks – for example, scripts to auto split items on silence,
or to trim items in one click, etc. Keep this in mind for the future; it’s not needed now, but if you find
yourself doing a tedious edit, there might be a script for it.
- Editing Exercises from Other DAWs: If you search for “DAW editing exercises,” even if they are for
another DAW, you can often do them in Reaper. For example, any tutorial on “how to comp vocals” or
“how to edit drums to the grid” – the concepts usually apply, just the tools differ. Use Reaper’s manual or
forum to translate those techniques into Reaper’s way of doing it.
Optional Advanced Topics (for later):
- Advanced Audio Editing Tools: Reaper has features like Dynamic Split (automatically split items based
on silence or transients) and Quantize for audio (aligning transient markers to grid). Once you grasp
manual editing, you can explore these to speed up tasks (e.g. splitting a drum recording at each hit for
tightening timing).
- Stretch Markers: These allow time-stretching specific parts of an item without slicing the item into
pieces. It’s great for correcting timing on a note or aligning a drum hit without a hard cut. After you’re
comfortable with basic splits, look into stretch markers as a way to do “elastic audio” style corrections.
- Spectral Editing: A very powerful but advanced feature – Reaper can display a spectrogram view of an
item and let you make edits to specific frequency content (like removing a cough or a bird chirp in the
background of a recording). This is overkill for now, but exciting to explore later if you deal with sound
30
31
32
33
6
design or cleaning up audio.
- External Editor Integration: Reaper can integrate with external audio editors (like Audacity, iZotope
RX, etc.). If in the future you need to do detailed waveform editing or noise reduction, you can configure
an external editor and launch it from within Reaper on a selected item. Optional, but good to know as
you expand your toolkit.
- Versioning and Takes Management: For large projects, you might explore using Project Tabs or
Snapshots (via SWS extension) to keep different edit versions. For example, you could have one tab
where you experiment with a different arrangement. This helps when you want to try radical edits
without losing your original arrangement. Again, consider this once you’ve done a few projects and find
the need for more complex management.
Stage 4: MIDI Composition and Editing Basics
With audio recording and editing under your belt, it’s time to delve into MIDI – a core aspect of modern
music production. In this stage, you’ll learn how to create and edit MIDI tracks in Reaper, which will
allow you to add virtual instruments (like software synthesizers or drum machines) to your projects. By
the end of this stage, you should be comfortable recording MIDI from a keyboard (or drawing notes by
hand) and editing MIDI data (notes and velocities) in Reaper’s piano roll.
Core Topics:
- MIDI Track Setup: Add a new track for MIDI composition. Remember, in Reaper a track can handle
MIDI and audio interchangeably. Typically, you will insert a virtual instrument (VSTi) on the track first
(we’ll cover instruments in the next stage, but you can use Reaper’s built-in ReaSynth or
ReaSamplOmatic5000 as a simple instrument for now). Alternatively, you can create a MIDI item without
an instrument just to see the notes.
- MIDI Input and Recording: If you have a MIDI keyboard/controller, enable it in Reaper’s preferences
under Audio > MIDI Devices. Set the track’s MIDI Input to your device (or to “All MIDI inputs”). Arm the
track and press Record – now playing your keyboard should record MIDI data (notes will appear as
vertical lines in a block, representing a MIDI “item”). The process is similar to audio recording : arm
track, select MIDI input, record and play notes . If you don’t have a physical keyboard, you can use
Reaper’s Virtual MIDI Keyboard (enable it from the View menu and use your PC keyboard to send
notes).
- Piano Roll Basics: After recording or inserting a MIDI item (you can also create an empty MIDI item by
double-clicking a blank area on a MIDI track), open the MIDI Editor/Piano Roll (double-click the MIDI
item). In this piano roll view, you’ll see a grid where you can edit notes. Learn to switch tools (draw or
select notes – by default, clicking adds notes). Core editing tasks here include: adding notes (doubleclick or draw), deleting notes (select and press delete), moving notes (drag), changing note length (drag
edge of note), and adjusting note velocity (usually via little bars or color of notes, or the velocity lane at
bottom).
- MIDI Note Editing: Practice common edits: quantize (align notes to grid timing if needed), transpose
notes (select and drag them up/down to change pitch, or use numpad +/- keys by default to transpose
selection). Understand that you can select multiple notes (click and drag a marquee or Ctrl+click) and
move or delete them together. Also learn how to zoom in/out in the MIDI editor, and scroll to navigate
different pitch ranges.
- MIDI CC and Automation: Notice the lanes at the bottom of the MIDI editor (e.g. Velocity by default).
These can display MIDI CC (Continuous Controller) data like modulation, sustain pedal, etc. For now,
focus on note velocities – try adjusting velocity values (which often correspond to how loud or accented
a note is). You can draw a velocity ramp or make all notes the same, and listen to the difference if your
instrument responds to velocity (most do). Additionally, realize that you can automate MIDI parameters
34
35
7
either by recording while turning knobs on a MIDI controller or by drawing CC curves. As a simple
exercise, you might draw a modulation wheel (CC1) curve if using a synth pad sound, to see how it
changes the sound over time. This is an introduction to MIDI automation.
- Using the MIDI Editor Efficiently: Learn about some useful features: the piano roll can be set to
musical scales or snap to key (useful if you want only notes in a certain key). Also, Reaper’s MIDI editor
has a grouping feature – if you enable Options > Automatically group MIDI notes or manually group
notes, you can move chords together easily . You might not need grouping now, but know it’s there
as a unique Reaper feature that can ease editing chords vs single notes.
- Step Recording (Optional): Reaper supports step recording (entering notes one at a time at a fixed
step length, via the Actions list). If you’re not a keyboard player, this can be a way to input a melody or
drum pattern precisely. It’s a bit hidden (you have to assign a key or button to “Step Recording: Insert
note…” actions). This is optional, but exploring it later might help if you prefer programming notes step
by step.
Practical Exercises:
- Record a Simple Melody via MIDI: Use either a MIDI keyboard or the Virtual MIDI Keyboard. Choose
a simple virtual instrument (e.g., ReaSynth which produces a simple tone). Arm a track for MIDI, hit
record, and play a short melody or chord progression (even if it’s just a few notes like “Twinkle Twinkle”
or a C major scale). After recording, play it back to hear the instrument sound. Then, open the piano roll
and examine the notes you recorded – adjust any off-timing notes by dragging them closer to the grid
(or try the Quantize function on a copy of the item). This exercise shows the full path from recording to
editing a MIDI performance.
- Program a Drum Beat: Add a virtual drum instrument (if you don’t have one, Reaper’s built-in
ReaSamplOmatic5000 can load a WAV sample – you could load a kick, snare, etc., but for ease, consider
using a free drum VST like MT Power DrumKit 2 or any soundfont player with a drum kit). Create a 2-
bar empty MIDI item and open it in the MIDI editor. Manually draw in a basic drum pattern (kick on 1
and 3, snare on 2 and 4, hi-hats on every beat, for example). Use the piano roll’s grid to line them up.
Play it back and adjust velocities: maybe make every other hi-hat softer for groove. This will teach you
how to compose using MIDI even if you can’t play in real-time.
- Editing a Chord Progression: If you recorded chords or want to practice, draw a simple chord
progression (like C major, F major, G major chords, one measure each). Once drawn, experiment with
editing: transpose the whole progression up by 2 semitones (select all notes, hit + on numpad or drag
up by two steps – you should hear it change key). Undo that. Try doubling the length of each chord: you
can do this by selecting all notes and dragging their right edges to stretch (if Options > Allow trim of MIDI
notes when splitting is on, or simply change grid size and redraw). The idea is to see that MIDI notes are
very malleable – you can change their pitch, timing, and duration easily after the fact.
- Use MIDI CC for Expression: In your melody or chord track, show the Modulation (CC1) lane (or
Expression (CC11) if your instrument supports it, or simply use Pitch Wheel). Draw a sweeping curve
while a sustained note plays (e.g., draw a pitch bend that goes up then down). Listen to how it affects
the sound. If using ReaSynth, modulation might not do much, but pitch wheel will. This is an
introduction to how MIDI controls can automate instrument nuances (like vibrato, filter cutoff via MIDI
CC, etc.). It ties into the next stage where we’ll look at automation more generally.
Useful Resources:
- Reaper User Guide – MIDI Basics: The user guide has sections on recording MIDI and using the MIDI
editor, including how to handle MIDI devices and routing. It’s a good reference if you get stuck on
technical points (like enabling your MIDI input).
- Official Videos – MIDI in Reaper: Kenny’s “Recording MIDI” video in This is REAPER 7 is a must-watch
. It shows the process of recording a MIDI track and might introduce the virtual MIDI keyboard.
Additionally, check “First MIDI Song” (a multi-part video series on the Reaper site) which walks through
creating a song using MIDI step by step . That series is perfect for seeing how MIDI composition
36
32
37
8
works in Reaper.
- MIDI Editor Guide (Tuts+ or Reaper Blog): Envato Tuts+ has a tutorial “How to Use Reaper’s MIDI
Editor/Envelopes” . The Reaper Blog also has videos explaining the MIDI editor features and tips (like
using scales, humanizing, etc.). These can give you ideas on workflow improvements as you start
working with MIDI more.
- MIDI Drumming Resources: If you want to dive into making drum tracks, look up tutorials on
programming drums in Reaper. Often they’ll share good practices (like using multiple tracks vs. single
track for drum MIDI, using the built-in MIDI grooves if you have them, etc.). groove3.com (paid) and
YouTube have content on this topic specifically for Reaper.
- Community Forums (MIDI specific): On the Reaper forum, there’s a section for MIDI hardware and
software. If your MIDI controller isn’t working or you have questions like “how to send MIDI to multiple
instruments,” the forum or r/Reaper subreddit can help. MIDI can sometimes be tricky (like dealing with
MIDI channels, program changes, etc.), so don’t hesitate to search for answers.
Optional Advanced Topics (for later):
- MIDI Routing and Multi-timbral Instruments: Later on, you might use one VST instrument that has
multiple sounds (for example, a drum plugin with separate outputs for each drum, or a synth
workstation that can play multiple parts on different MIDI channels). Reaper can route one MIDI track
to multiple instrument tracks or route multiple MIDI channels to different sounds of one instrument.
This is more advanced routing that you can explore when needed. It involves using sends or creating
Instrument tracks with multiple MIDI channels.
- MIDI Plugins and Tools: Reaper includes JSFX MIDI plugins (e.g. arpeggiators, MIDI note filters) and
you can also use VST MIDI effects. These can perform tasks like chord generation, arpeggiation, or
transposing notes on the fly. Once you’re comfortable with basics, try adding a JSFX Arpeggiator to a
MIDI track, or use the Humanize function to randomize velocities/timings slightly for realism.
- Advanced MIDI Editing Features: Reaper’s MIDI editor has many features under the hood – for
instance, the event list view (to edit raw MIDI data), named note rows (useful if you load a drum map so
that drums are named instead of just piano keys), and MIDI event filtering (to show/hide certain events).
As your projects grow, learning these features can improve efficiency. For example, if you do orchestral
MIDI work, you might use note names for articulations or use CC lanes extensively – Reaper can handle
it all.
- ReaControlMIDI: This is a stock plugin that lets you send MIDI CC messages and even bank/program
changes from a convenient interface. If you have external MIDI hardware (synths) or want to automate
patch changes, ReaControlMIDI is something to look into. It also allows you to control synth parameters
via envelopes in the main project (like automate CCs similar to how you automate audio FX). This
bridges the gap between MIDI and Reaper’s automation system, which leads nicely into the next stage.
Stage 5: Working with Virtual Instruments and Plugins
This stage expands on MIDI by focusing on virtual instruments (VSTi plugins) and also introduces using
audio FX plugins. Essentially, you will learn how to load instruments to generate sound from MIDI, how
to add effects to tracks, and some fundamentals of sound design within Reaper. By the end of this
stage, you’ll be able to create a simple production using virtual instruments (like drums, bass, synths)
and apply basic effects (EQ, reverb, etc.) to enhance the sounds.
A Reaper project with several virtual instrument tracks (e.g. drums, bass, synth). The MIDI editor (piano roll) is
open for one track (bottom left), and the mixer (bottom) shows inserts for effects on each track. This is the kind
of setup you’ll create as you layer instruments and plugins in your projects.
38
9
Core Topics:
- Inserting Virtual Instruments (VSTi): Learn how to load a virtual instrument on a track. The simplest
way: click the track’s FX button, then choose an instrument plugin (Reaper comes with a basic synth
called ReaSynth, a sampler ReaSamplOmatic5000, and you can install third-party VSTi plugins). After
inserting, when you play/record MIDI on that track, you should hear the instrument. Reaper also has a
shortcut: Insert > Virtual instrument on new track… which sets up a track with an instrument in one go.
- Managing VST Plugins: Understand the distinction between instrument plugins (which generate
sound from MIDI) and effect plugins (which process audio). In Reaper’s FX Browser, instruments are
usually tagged as <i>VSTi</i>. You can also install many free or paid plugins for both instruments and
effects. Learn how to scan for new plugins (Preferences > VST > add plugin paths, if you install thirdparty plugins). By default, Reaper comes with the ReaPlugs suite covering many effect types (EQ,
compression, reverb, delay, etc.).
- Chain Ordering: When you add plugins to a track, note that the order matters (audio flows through
them in series). For an instrument track, the instrument VSTi must be before any audio effects in the
chain (since MIDI goes in, gets turned into audio by the instrument, then that audio can be processed
by later FX). Reaper’s FX chain makes it easy to reorder by drag-and-drop. For example, you might have
[Instrument] -> [Reverb] -> [EQ] in that order.
- Using Built-in Instruments/Effects: Explore the quality and capabilities of Reaper’s built-in plugins.
Reaper’s suite includes ReaEQ (a multiband equalizer), ReaComp (compressor), ReaVerbate/ReaVerb
(reverbs), ReaDelay, ReaSynth (basic synth), ReaSamplOmatic5000 (sampler), etc. While they have
plain interfaces, they are powerful and lightweight. For instance, add ReaEQ to a track and experiment
with adjusting frequencies, or use ReaVerbate to add a simple room reverb. This will give you a feel for
mixing tools. According to reviews, Reaper’s stock plugins can achieve professional sound –
they’re fully capable of EQing, compressing, etc., to polish your mix.
- Third-Party Plugins: Begin incorporating third-party instruments and FX. For instruments: there are
excellent free VSTis like Vital (synth), Surge (synth), LABS by Spitfire (various instruments), Sitala
(drum sampler), and many others . Try installing one that interests you (ensure you put the .dll
or .vst3 in your plugin folder and re-scan). For effects: consider trying a popular free guitar amp sim if
you play guitar, or an analog-style EQ/compressor for flavor. There’s a wealth of freebies. The key is to
not get overwhelmed – add new plugins one at a time and learn them.
- Presets and Plugin Settings: When using complex virtual instruments (like a synth), leverage presets
to get started. Load a preset (most VSTi have preset browsers) and see how it sounds. Similarly, Reaper’s
plugins often come with some presets (like ReaEQ has basic EQ presets for different uses). Using
presets can be a quick way to learn what a plugin can do, but also try tweaking parameters to
understand their effect (e.g., change an oscillator wave in a synth, or adjust the decay on a reverb).
- Basic Sound Design Concepts: As you play with instruments, note basic terms: Oscillators, Filters,
Envelopes (ADSR) on synths, or samples, velocity layers on samplers. While a deep topic on its own,
you should at least familiarize with how to shape a synth’s sound (e.g., use a low-pass filter to make a
synth mellow, or change the attack on an envelope to soften the note onset). Likewise for drum
samplers, know how to load your own sample or adjust tuning. This knowledge accumulates gradually;
don’t worry about mastering it immediately.
- Rendering/Frezzing Virtual Instruments (Optional at this stage): If your project starts to lag due to
heavy instrument plugins, Reaper allows you to freeze tracks (i.e. render the MIDI to audio to save CPU,
while preserving the ability to unfreeze). Just be aware of this feature; you might not need it yet in small
projects, but it’s good to know as you add more instruments and effects.
Practical Exercises:
- Create a Simple Song with 3 Instruments: Start a new project (or continue from Stage 4’s MIDI
project). Add at least three instrument tracks, e.g.: a drum kit plugin for drums, a bass instrument, and
a piano or synth for chords/melody. If you don’t have third-party plugins, you can use
ReaSamplOmatic5000 for drums (load some WAV drum samples for kick, snare, hi-hat on separate
39 40
41 42
10
tracks, or use a soundfont), ReaSynth for a bass tone, and perhaps TAL-Noisemaker (free) for a synth
lead. Record or program a short part on each track (4 or 8 bars). Now you have a simple arrangement.
Practice mixing these: adjust volume faders so drums/bass/melody are balanced. Pan slightly if needed
(maybe bass center, melody slightly right, something else left). This mini-production will combine all
skills so far and make it clear how MIDI instruments and audio playback form a full song.
- Apply Basic Effects: On your instrument tracks from above, insert some Reaper stock FX: e.g., add
ReaEQ on the master track or individual tracks – try cutting some low frequencies on the melody to
make space for the bass, or boosting the high end on cymbals. Add ReaComp on the drum track to
tighten the drums (use a preset like “Drum Bus” if available, then adjust threshold). Put ReaDelay or a
third-party delay on the lead synth to give it an echo. By toggling FX on and off (the checkbox next to
the plugin name in the chain or the FX button on the track control panel), you can hear what each is
doing. This trains your ear to what effects contribute. Note: don’t worry if it’s not “mixed like a record” –
the aim is just to experiment with FX in context.
- Explore a Synth’s Parameters: Take one virtual synth (for example, the free OB-Xd or Surge or
ReaSynth if nothing else) and play a held note while tweaking controls. Change the waveform, filter
cutoff, resonance, envelope attack/decay, etc., one at a time. Observe how the sound changes (e.g.,
filter cutoff will remove high frequencies making it muffled , resonance will add a sharp peak at the
cutoff). If the synth has modulation (LFOs), try modulating something (or simply use the mod wheel if
it’s mapped). This exercise isn’t specific to Reaper – it’s general synth familiarity – but doing it now
solidifies how virtual instruments operate, which helps you use them creatively in Reaper.
- Try a Third-Party FX Plugin: Download a popular free effect, like TDR Nova (dynamic EQ) or
OrilRiver (reverb) or Valhalla Supermassive (delay/reverb). Install it and load it on a track in Reaper.
Experiment with presets or random adjustments. For example, put Supermassive on a synth pad track
and choose a huge reverb preset – enjoy the ambience. The purpose is to ensure you know how to
expand Reaper with external plugins and to get a taste of what’s out there. Over time, you’ll collect tools
you like.
Useful Resources:
- Reaper Video – “FX & Plugins”: The This is REAPER 7 series has an episode on using FX and plugins .
It likely shows how to add an effect to a track (clicking the FX button) and explains chain order. This is
fundamental and worth watching if you haven’t already.
- “Free Instruments Plugins” List (Reaper Blog): On the Reaper.fm videos page, there’s actually a
whole section listing recommended free instrument plugins (Arturia Analog Lab Play, Sitala, Spitfire
Labs, Vital, etc.) . Each of those is linked to a video explaining how to use them with Reaper. Use
those resources to both expand your sound library and learn any specific setup quirks (for instance,
multi-output routing for Sitala or Surge).
- The Reaper Blog & Reapertips (FX Tutorials): These community resources often post “Top 5 free
reverb plugins” or “How to use sidechain compression in Reaper” etc. Check out Reapertips.com for
quick tips on plugin management (like creating shortcuts to your favorite plugins ) and The Reaper
Blog for more in-depth examples of using effects in mixes.
- Manual – Chapter on ReaPlugs: The user guide has a section dedicated to the built-in effects (ReaEQ,
ReaComp, etc.) . It’s a great reference for what each parameter does. For example, if you’re not sure
what “Ratio” on ReaComp means, the manual will explain it. Since the ReaPlugs have somewhat
utilitarian UI, referencing the manual can demystify them.
- Plugin Documentation and Forums: If you use third-party plugins, don’t forget to consult their
manuals or online forums for help. For example, the Vital synth has its own manual/wiki and community
forum. Many popular plugins have YouTube tutorials dedicated to them. Leverage those to learn the
instrument’s deeper features (e.g., modulation matrix, effects) beyond what we cover here.
Optional Advanced Topics (for later):
- Sidechain Compression and Advanced Routing: A classic technique in mixing is sidechain
43
44
41 45
46
47
11
compression (e.g., ducking the bass when the kick drum hits). Reaper’s flexible routing makes this easy.
Once you’re comfortable with basic plugin use, try routing your kick track to a compressor on the bass
track as a sidechain input, so the bass compresses with each kick. This involves using track channels
(e.g., sending audio to channels 3-4 on the bass track where ReaComp is set to listen on auxiliary input).
It’s an intermediate skill that yields a very useful effect for mixing.
- Folder Tracks as Busses: Reaper allows tracks to act as group buses by using folder tracks (you make
a track a folder, put other tracks inside it – the folder sums them). Explore using a folder for, say, all
drum tracks, then apply one reverb on the folder to affect the whole drum bus. This is a simple
introduction to routing and bus processing (which we cover more in Stage 8).
- MIDI Effects and Generators: Go deeper into MIDI plugins like arpeggiators, sequencers (e.g., there’s
a JSFX called Megababy step sequencer, and Sower or Stochas sequencer VSTs ). These tools can help
generate patterns or add complexity to your MIDI parts. For example, you could use an arpeggiator on
held chords to create rhythmic patterns automatically. It’s an optional creative avenue once you’re
comfortable with manual composition.
- Sampling and Sound Design: With ReaSamplOmatic5000 or a dedicated sampler plugin, you can start
building your own sampled instruments (e.g., record some percussion hits and map them to different
MIDI notes). Reaper can also record soft synths’ output to audio if you want to resample sounds.
Getting into sampling and custom instrument creation can be a rewarding advanced topic if you’re into
sound design.
- Plugin Performance and Bridging: If using many heavy plugins, learn about Reaper’s performance
view (hotkey Ctrl+P while in Performance Meter) to monitor CPU per plugin. Reaper can also run
plugins out-of-process (bridging 32-bit plugins or running separate processes for reliability). This is
more technical, but as you use more plugins, it’s useful to know Reaper’s robust handling options (for
instance, if a plugin crashes, a dedicated process might prevent it from crashing Reaper). Keep this
knowledge in your back pocket as your sessions grow.
Stage 6: Mixing Fundamentals
Mixing is the art and science of blending multiple tracks into a cohesive stereo output. In this stage, you
will focus on the core mixing techniques: balancing levels, panning, EQ, compression, and using send
effects like reverb and delay. Reaper’s mixer and routing capabilities will be your tools. By the end of
this stage, you’ll be able to take recorded or programmed tracks and mix them into a rough but
listenable song, applying common mix processes.
Core Topics:
- The Mixing Console in Reaper: Switch to the mixer view (if not visible, press Ctrl+M or enable the
Mixer in the View menu). Each track appears as a channel strip with volume fader, pan knob, FX slots,
sends, and routing buttons. Get comfortable with this layout – it’s analogous to a physical mixing board.
You can mix in the track control panels too, but many find the mixer view convenient for seeing multiple
faders at once .
- Volume Balance: The first step in mixing is setting relative volumes. Practice adjusting faders of your
tracks to achieve a balanced mix where all elements can be heard and the important ones (like vocals or
lead instruments) are appropriately foregrounded. Use Reaper’s meters to ensure the master track isn’t
clipping (you might lower all faders or the master fader to keep peaks below 0 dB). This stage is often
called the static mix.
- Panning: Utilize the pan knobs to position instruments in the stereo field. For example, pan guitars
left and right, keep bass and kick center, perhaps pan backing vocals or percussion to create width.
Panning helps prevent everything from clumping in the center and gives space in the mix. Reaper’s pan
is by default a simple balance control (for stereo tracks), but it has options for more advanced panning
48
49
12
laws if needed. Stick to basics for now: decide where each track “sits” between left and right.
- Equalization (EQ): EQ is essential for carving out space and shaping tone. Use ReaEQ or any EQ
plugin. Learn to identify and adjust basic frequency areas: for instance, roll off low-end rumble on nonbass tracks (high-pass filter around 80Hz or so), cut “muddy” frequencies in certain instruments (e.g.,
around 250Hz on guitars or vocals if they sound boomy), and add a high-shelf to cymbals or air to
vocals (~8kHz+) for brightness . A good approach is subtractive EQ (cutting problem frequencies)
before additive (boosting). Train your ears by soloing tracks and sweeping an EQ band with a boost to
find harsh or muddy spots, then cut. Do subtle adjustments – small EQ moves can have a big impact in
context.
- Compression: Learn the purpose of compression – controlling dynamic range and adding punch or
sustain. Start with ReaComp. Try compressing a snare or vocal: set ratio ~4:1, lower the threshold until
you see 3-6 dB of gain reduction on peaks, then adjust attack/release (e.g., medium attack for drums to
let the initial hit through, fast release to recover quickly). Compression can make a track sit more
steadily in the mix or bring up details. It’s easy to overdo, so compare the compressed vs uncompressed
by toggling the FX. Also use the makeup gain to level-match so you aren’t just preferring louder.
Common uses: compress vocals for consistency, bass for evenness, drums for punch, guitars maybe
lightly for sustain. ReaComp has a handy auto-release and even a built-in detector EQ if needed
(advanced). But to start, focus on threshold, ratio, attack, release, makeup gain.
- Send Effects (Reverb/Delay): Instead of putting a reverb on every track (which can muddy the mix
and use more CPU), Reaper encourages using send effects. Create a new track, name it “Reverb”, and
add a Reverb plugin (e.g., ReaVerbate or a convolution reverb). Set the reverb plugin to 100% wet (since
this track will carry only reverb). Now send multiple tracks to this reverb track: on each track’s Routing,
Add New Send to the Reverb track (or drag from the IO button of a track and drop on the Reverb track).
Adjust the send level (how much of each track goes to the reverb). This way, you have a unified reverb
“space” and you can control overall reverb volume easily. Do the same for a Delay FX track if desired.
This teaches you Reaper’s flexible routing while also following best practices of mixing (using buses for
FX) .
- Mix Bus Processing: Apply mild processing on the master bus if needed – e.g., a glue compressor or
an EQ to gently shape the entire mix (don’t overdo this at the learning stage). Understand the signal
flow: all tracks sum to the Master. Ensure no track is clipping individually and that the Master output
peaks around -6 dBFS or so to leave headroom for mastering. Reaper’s 64-bit mix engine makes internal
clipping unlikely, but plugins can still clip if fed too hot, so gain staging matters. Get in the habit of
keeping levels controlled (you can use ReaComp or a limiter on the master just to catch any overs while
practicing, but ideally your mix should be balanced without constant limiting).
- Referencing and A/B: Bring in a reference track (a professionally mixed song in a similar genre) by
importing it to a track and lowering it to roughly match your mix’s volume. Mute/unmute it to compare
how your mix’s tonal balance and levels compare. This trains your ears to mix toward a target. Reaper
even has a JSFX called AB_LM for level-matched A/B if you want to get fancy. Early on, just use ears and
the solo/mute. Take note: is your mix too boomy compared to reference? Too dull? Adjust accordingly
with EQ or levels.
Practical Exercises:
- Mix a Provided Multitrack: Download a free multitrack project (for example, from the Cambridge MT
“Mixing Secrets” library – they offer many beginner-friendly multitracks in various genres). Import
the audio tracks into Reaper (they might be raw recordings). Without worrying about recording or MIDI,
focus purely on mixing these given tracks. Set levels, pan them, add EQ to each as needed, compress
where appropriate, and use at least one reverb send for ambience. This is mixing practice in isolation – it
lets you work on mixing skills even if you don’t have your own recordings yet. By working with
professionally recorded tracks, you can better hear the effect of your mix moves.
- Remix Your Stage 5 Project: Take the mini-song you created with virtual instruments in Stage 5. Now
mix it as if it were separate recorded tracks: treat each instrument track with EQ (e.g., high-pass the
39
50
51
13
synth pad to avoid bass buildup, notch any resonant frequency in the lead sound, etc.) and maybe
compression (compress the drum bus or the snare if it’s too peaky). Set up a reverb send and send your
instruments to it to glue them in one space. Also try using a delay send for the lead if it adds vibe. The
idea is to turn that raw balance into a more polished mix by processing. This will also teach you how
mixing virtual instrument tracks might differ a bit from mixing recorded audio (instruments might be
too clean/noisy or too dynamic, etc., requiring some adjustment).
- Volume Automation for Balance: Before we formally cover automation in the next stage, you can
already apply a bit in mixing: if one section of your song is too loud or quiet, you can use simple volume
envelope. Show the Volume Envelope on a track (click the trim/envelope button and select volume).
Add 2-3 points and drag the line to create a volume dip or boost for that section. For example,
automate the rhythm guitar down a bit during the verse when the vocal is present, then back up for an
instrumental chorus. This introduces the concept of dynamic mixing – not leaving levels static all the
way through. It’s a key to professional mixes (riding vocals, etc.). We’ll expand on automation soon, but
this exercise is a practical teaser.
- Critical Listening and Iteration: Export (render) your mix to a stereo WAV or MP3. Listen to it on
different speakers or headphones. Make notes of what could be better (maybe the vocal is too low, or
the mix is too bass-heavy). Go back into Reaper and adjust accordingly. This exercise of rendering and
reviewing is crucial – it mimics the real world where you test your mix on various systems. Reaper’s
rendering (File > Render) will mix down your project; just ensure the master isn’t clipping and perhaps
normalize to -1 dB or so if making an MP3. Each iteration, you’ll discover improvements. Don’t be afraid
to do multiple passes – that’s how real mixing often works.
Useful Resources:
- REAPER Blog – “Mixing in Reaper” Series: There are blog posts and videos dedicated to mixing
techniques within Reaper. For instance, Jon Tidey (Reaper Blog) has covered topics like gain staging in
Reaper, using folders for buses, creating FX chains, etc. Also, Kenny’s official videos under Mixing in
REAPER (on the Reaper site) include tutorials like “Mixing Real Drums,” “Mixing Bass,” “Panning in a Mix,”
etc. – these are gold. They show real-world mixing scenarios in Reaper step by step. Watch a
couple that align with your practice (e.g., if you’re mixing a rock song with live drums, Kenny’s “Mixing
Real Live Drums” video will be directly relevant).
- Textbook Recommendation – ReaMix: Breaking the Barriers with REAPER: This is a book by Geoffrey
Francis (the Reaper manual author) focusing on mixing techniques in Reaper . It comes with
example project files and step-by-step mix scenarios. It’s a bit dated (written for an older Reaper
version) but the principles still apply. If you prefer a structured learning through reading and examples,
ReaMix is highly regarded and specifically tailored to Reaper’s tools.
- General Mixing Tutorials: Mixing is a universal skill, not just Reaper-specific. Resources like “The
Mixing Secrets for the Small Studio” book, or YouTube channels like Produce Like A Pro, Pensado’s Place,
etc., offer tons of mixing advice. As you consume those, just translate the techniques to Reaper (e.g., if
they use an EQ in Pro Tools at 200 Hz, you can do the same with ReaEQ, etc.). One advantage of Reaper
is its flexibility – it can do essentially everything the “big” DAWs do in mixing , so none of those
techniques are off-limits.
- Forums and Mix Review: Consider joining communities like r/WeAreTheMusicMakers or the Reaper
forum’s “mix critique” threads, where you can post your mix and get feedback. It’s a great way to learn
what to focus on. People might say “the vocal is buried” or “too much reverb on drums” – these pointers
accelerate your learning. Just be open to critique. Cambridge MT also has a forum for discussing mixes
of the tracks they provide. Engaging there can expose you to different mix approaches and opinions.
Optional Advanced Topics (for later):
- Advanced Signal Routing: Reaper’s routing shines in advanced mixing. Down the line, learn to use
parallel processing (duplicating a track or using parallel split via JSFX or channels for, say, parallel
compression on drums: blend a heavily compressed signal with the dry one). Also explore mid/side
52 53
54
55 56
14
processing using plugins that support it, or routing tricks (Reaper can encode/decode MS internally
using JSFX). These techniques allow sophisticated mix processing when basic tools aren’t enough.
- Folder vs Bus vs VCA: Reaper now supports VCA groups (if you need analog-style voltage control
behavior). Understanding the difference: Folders are a simple way to bus tracks and control them
together (and route as a unit) . VCAs (voltage controlled amplifier) allow you to link faders without
summing audio. It’s an advanced mixing concept – not necessary for small projects, but if you have
huge sessions, you might use VCAs to control groups of tracks (e.g., all orchestral strings) without
altering their routing. Know that Reaper gives you all these options when you need them.
- Automation Modes & Volume Trim: When your mixes get complex, learn about different automation
modes (Trim/Read, Latch, Touch, Write). For example, Trim/Read mode is useful for fine-tuning fader
moves without losing your static mix setup. We’ll discuss more in Stage 7, but just be aware that Reaper
has very powerful automation features that go hand-in-hand with mixing.
- Mix Bus and Mastering Plugins: Many engineers use specialized plugins on the mix bus (like tape
simulators, console emulators, or stereo wideners). As you advance, experiment with these to shape the
overall mix. Reaper can load practically any mastering suite or third-party plugin. For instance, you
could try a subtle tape saturation (using a free one like TDR SlickSAT or similar) on the master to add
analog warmth. Treat this as optional seasoning – it can improve a mix’s cohesion if used wisely.
- Loudness Metering: Eventually, you’ll think about final levels and loudness. Get familiar with the JSFX
Master LUFS metering (Reaper provides a loudness meter in the master track FX by default). This helps
in understanding integrated loudness of your mix. While mixing, it’s not critical to hit a specific LUFS
(that’s more of a mastering concern), but being aware of your mix’s loudness range and peaks can
inform your decisions (e.g., if the chorus is 6 LU louder than the verse, maybe you intended that impact
or maybe it’s too much). This becomes more relevant as you move to mastering.
Stage 7: Automation Techniques
Automation is what brings static mixes and sequences to life by introducing dynamic changes over
time. In Reaper, almost any parameter can be automated – volume, pan, plugin knobs, sends, etc. This
stage will cover how to use automation envelopes and items to create movement and interest in your
production, as well as to perform necessary adjustments (like volume rides on vocals). By the end, you
should be comfortable drawing and managing automation envelopes for common tasks.
Core Topics:
- Volume and Pan Automation Envelopes: Each track in Reaper can show envelopes for volume, pan,
and any FX parameters. Activate an envelope by clicking the track’s Envelope button (Trim) and ticking
the ones you want (e.g., Volume). This will display a horizontal line (the envelope) across the track. You
can add points to this line by clicking (Ctrl+click on PC by default) and then drag points or segments to
adjust the value over time. For example, create a fade-out by adding a point where you want the fade to
start (at 0 dB), another point at the end of the song at -inf dB, and dragging that down – now volume
drops gradually. Practice doing this on a track’s volume to understand the mechanics.
- Plugin Parameter Automation: Try automating a plugin parameter, such as a filter cutoff on a synth
or the wet mix of a reverb. There are a couple of ways: you can use the envelope window (find the
parameter in the FX’s list and enable its envelope), or touch the control on the plugin UI then use Param
> Show track envelope for last touched parameter. Once visible, it behaves like the volume envelope – you
can add points and shape it. For example, automate a low-pass filter to gradually open up (classic “filter
sweep”) over 8 bars of a build-up. This is a creative use of automation to make a section more exciting.
- Writing Automation in Real-Time: Reaper supports different automation modes: Trim/Read (static
until you edit), Write (overwrites automation as you move faders), Touch (writes only when you touch a
control), Latch (similar to touch but stays writing after touch until stop). A common approach is to use
57
15
Touch mode on a track, press play, and then physically move a fader or knob (if you have a control
surface or using the mouse on the GUI) to record automation in real time. For instance, you could “ride”
the vocal volume fader to even out a performance – louder in quiet parts, down a bit in loud parts.
When done, switch back to Read mode to have Reaper play back that automation. Try this on a short
section: put a track in Touch mode, hit play, and move the volume fader with your mouse to create a
quick volume swell or dip. Stop, then look at the envelope that was written. This teaches you how
automation can be performed manually, not just drawn.
- Automation Items: A powerful Reaper feature is automation items – essentially containers of
automation that you can copy/paste like items. For example, if you create a complex pan motion over
one bar, you can turn that into an automation item and repeat it every bar, rather than drawing it each
time . To create one, make a time selection over the envelope, right-click and choose “Insert
automation item”. Now that block can be copied or moved. This is optional for beginners, but worth
knowing as it sets Reaper apart from many DAWs. It’s especially handy for tempo-synced or repetitive
modulations.
- Managing Multiple Envelopes: In larger projects, you might automate dozens of parameters. Reaper
offers organization: you can show/hide envelopes, and there’s an Envelopes/Automation window
(under View > Automation or the envelope button) where you can manage visibility and arming of
envelopes. It’s good to learn to hide automation when you’re not working on it (for screen clarity) and
arm only the ones you intend to write. Also, note that envelopes can be on separate lanes or in the
media lane – whichever you prefer.
- Editing and Finesse: Learn some editing tricks: You can select multiple envelope points (marquee
select) and move them together, or copy/paste them. You can also shift+drag a point for finer
resolution adjustments. The context menu on envelopes has shapes for fades (linear, square, slow start/
end etc.) which you can apply to transitions between points for different curves. Play with those to see
how, say, a slow-start curve differs from linear – it affects the “feel” of the automation change (e.g., a
slow fade-in vs linear fade-in).
- Project-wide Automation Considerations: Understand that automation data is tied to time. If you
rearrange your song (move items around) after writing automation, you need to ensure automation
moves too. By default, envelope points will move with media items if Options > Envelope Points move with
media items is enabled (do check that, as it’s often on by default). This saves a lot of headache – if it’s off,
you might move a chorus but the automation stays behind, leading to chaos. So confirm that setting to
avoid surprises. Also, if you ripple edit, note that it should also affect envelope points (so your volume
rides etc., remain aligned with the audio). These are details, but crucial for maintaining your mix when
structuring the song.
Practical Exercises:
- Fade and Mute Automation: Take a track (say a backing guitar) and automate it to fade out for a few
bars, then back in (simulate it dropping out for effect). For instance, during a verse, gradually lower the
guitar to almost mute, then when the chorus hits, bring it back up. Use a volume envelope for this. This
exercise is straightforward but shows how automation can create dynamics in an arrangement (similar
to how a band might play softer then louder).
- Pan Movement: If you have a sustained sound (maybe a synth pad or a long effect), try an auto-pan
effect using automation. Draw a pan envelope that makes the sound go from left to right over 4 beats,
and repeat. Listen to it – it adds stereo interest. Alternatively, record the pan automation live: put the
track in Latch mode, press play, and sweep the pan knob left to right. This can also be done with an LFO
Tool but doing it manually teaches the basics.
- Vocal Ride: If you have a vocal (or any lead melody), do a manual volume ride to improve its
consistency. Go through line by line: add envelope points to slightly boost a word that’s too quiet or
reduce one that’s too loud. Essentially, you’re doing what a compressor does, but manually. This trains
your ear to identify level inconsistencies and also shows how powerful detailed automation can be.
Many mix engineers still automate vocals even after compression, to ensure every word is audible but
58
16
not overwhelming. Aim to keep the vocal riding just above the backing music in volume throughout.
- Creative Effect Automation: Pick a creative effect and automate it on and off. Example: automate a
delay send – perhaps you want a “delay throw” on the last word of a vocal line. Instead of keeping the
delay send up all the time, automate the send level: it stays at 0 (no send) and then just for that word it
jumps to send a bunch of volume to the delay, then back down. This will result in only that word
echoing out. Reaper can automate send levels too (show send envelopes on the destination track or via
envelopes on the source track). Another example: automate a stutter effect by automating a mute or a
glitch plugin on/off. The sky’s the limit – think of an effect you’d like to happen only at certain moments
and use automation to achieve it. This exercise underscores how automation can be used for ear candy
and not just utilitarian moves.
- Experiment with Automation Items (advanced): If you’re feeling confident, try using automation
items for a rhythmic effect. For instance, on a filter cutoff envelope, instead of drawing a bunch of
points for a repeated pattern, create an automation item that does a quick oscillation (maybe a square
wave style on/off) and then copy-paste that item across 16 bars. This could simulate a trance gate or
rhythmic filter. It’s a niche use, but it will expose you to how automation items work (they have their
own little container and can even be saved for reuse). If this is too confusing, skip it for now – it’ll be
there when you need it.
Useful Resources:
- Official Video – “Envelopes & Automation”: Kenny’s This is REAPER 7 includes an Envelopes &
Automation tutorial . It likely covers showing envelopes and basic editing of them. This is a perfect
introduction if you prefer to see it done. Watch how points are added and perhaps how writing with
faders is done.
- Reaper Blog – Automation Tutorials: There are videos like “Understanding REAPER Automation
Modes” on the Reaper Blog and articles on Reapertips (for example, “Guide to Automation Items in
Reaper” ). These can clarify the differences between modes (Trim vs Write vs Latch, etc.) and give you
visual examples of automation items. The Reapertips guide in particular explains how to use
automation items step by step.
- Envato Tuts+ – Reaper Automation: The Envato Tuts+ site has a tutorial “How to Use Reaper
Automation and Envelopes” which might cover some practical scenarios. It’s always good to see
multiple explanations to reinforce your understanding.
- Forum Tips: If you run into any confusion (like “why is my envelope not affecting the sound” or “how
to copy automation to another track”), the forum is helpful. Common issues like forgetting to switch back
to Read mode (so you accidentally overwrite automation) or wanting finer control of points have known
solutions (e.g., you can reduce the vertical scale of an envelope lane for more precision). Searching the
Reaper forum or asking will get you those nuanced answers quickly.
- Control Surfaces for Automation: If you ever consider using a hardware fader (MIDI controller) for
automation, Reaper supports many protocols (Mackie Control Universal, EuCon, OSC, etc.). That’s
beyond scope for now, but as an FYI, should you get a control surface, look up “Reaper control surface
setup” on the forum – many users have shared configurations. Moving a physical fader to write
automation can be more intuitive than using a mouse.
Optional Advanced Topics (for later):
- Parameter Modulation and LFOs: Reaper has a unique feature called Parameter Modulation
(accessible via the FX plugin window’s Param button). This allows you to modulate a plugin parameter
with an LFO, audio signal, or link it to another parameter. It’s like automation, but more dynamic. For
example, you can have an EQ frequency move in sync with the amplitude of another track (dynamic EQ
without dedicated plugin) or apply an LFO wobble to a filter without drawing it manually. Once you’re
comfortable with standard automation, explore parameter modulation – it can achieve complex effects
(like auto-wah, ducking synths, rhythmic tremolos, etc.) without manually drawing envelopes .
- Global Automation Overrides: Reaper offers powerful overrides, such as globally bypassing all
59
60
58
38
61
17
automation (useful if you want to do a “static mix” check) or writing current values to an entire range
(via the Automation panel you can e.g. write current fader level to entire song). These are advanced
mixing techniques – for instance, at the end of a mix you might decide your overall vocal automation is
too low, you can trim it up easily rather than moving dozens of points. Keep in mind these capabilities
for when your automation gets complex and you need to fine-tune en masse.
- Snapshot Automation (via SWS): The SWS extension adds a feature called Snapshots which can recall
track states (including levels, mutes, etc.). While not exactly automation, you can use snapshots to
quickly A/B different automation or mix states. There is also Region Playlist in SWS that can automate
playing sections in different order (like an arrangement tool). These are more production-oriented, but
can intersect with automation usage if, say, you want to audition different rides or effect settings
quickly.
- MIDI Controller Automation (MIDI Learn/OSC): Another dimension is controlling Reaper’s
parameters via external MIDI or OSC messages. Reaper allows you to MIDI learn almost any knob/fader.
For instance, map a MIDI slider to the reverb send level of a track, and then record automation by
moving that slider. Or use a tablet with an OSC app to write automation. Setting this up is a mini-project
on its own (involves the Actions list or the FX “Learn” feature), but once you’re diving deeper, it can make
automation more performance-like. Some advanced users even write automation with envelopes using
scripts or external DAW controllers. It’s endless, but the takeaway: Reaper can adapt to how you want to
automate, whether by drawing, performing live, or even generating via scripts.
Stage 8: Routing, Buses, and Signal Flow (Advanced Mixing)
Reaper’s routing capabilities are one of its strongest features. This stage is dedicated to understanding
and exploiting routing and signal flow for complex setups: using buses, sends, sidechains, and multichannel routing. These skills are crucial for advanced mixing techniques (like submixes, parallel
processing) and large projects (managing many tracks efficiently). By the end of this stage, you’ll have
mastery over where your audio is going within Reaper, enabling you to set up any configuration you
need.
Core Topics:
- Track Channels and Sends: In Reaper, each track can handle up to 64 channels of audio internally
(way beyond stereo). This allows sending audio in flexible ways. For basic uses, a send takes the postfader output of one track into another track. We used this for reverb sends already. Understand how to
adjust send properties: you can send pre-fader (so the send is unaffected by the track’s fader – useful
for doing parallel processing) or post-fader (default, follow fader) or post-FX. You can also choose how
many channels to send (the default 2 -> 2 means stereo to stereo). For sidechain, you often send to 3/4
of a track that has an effect listening on 3/4. Grasping these options is key to custom routing.
- Creating Submix Buses: Similar to using folder tracks, you can create standalone bus tracks for
grouping. For example, route all your vocal tracks’ outputs to a “Vocal Bus” track (by changing their
Parent Send off and adding sends to the bus, or simpler: set their Parent to None and hardware output
to bus track as new parent – Reaper allows multiple parent folders but it’s easier to use sends in this
case). Many users simply use folders for buses (which is fine), but sends give more freedom (one track
can send to multiple buses, etc.). The concept: a bus is a track that sums several tracks, letting you
process them together or control one fader. Use-case: All backing vocals to one bus with a compressor
to glue them, or all drums to one bus for overall EQ/compression. Practice making a bus: add a new
track “Drum Bus”, select all drum tracks and drag them onto “Drum Bus” track as a folder, or manually
route their outputs to it. Compare folder vs send bus to see that they achieve the same summing result.
- Sidechain and Ducking: Implement sidechain compression as touched on earlier. Choose a track to
be compressed (e.g. Bass) and a source track to trigger (Kick drum). On the Bass track’s ReaComp, set
18
Detector Input to Auxiliary (meaning it will listen to channels 3/4). Then send Kick to Bass track channels
3/4 (in Routing, add send to Bass, set Audio: 1/2 -> 3/4). Now the Bass compresses when Kick hits .
Tweak threshold/ratio in ReaComp to get a few dB gain reduction on each kick. This is a classic routing
trick. You can similarly sidechain a gate or any other effect that offers an aux input. Recognize that
sidechaining is just a special case of routing one signal into another’s plugin control input.
- Multi-Channel and Surround: If you ever do surround sound or complex multi-mic processing,
Reaper can route multi-channel audio. For instance, ReaSurround or third-party surround plugins can
take 6-channel input. Or if you record drums with multiple mics, you might experiment with encoding
them to a multichannel item. While not necessary for stereo music production, know that Reaper can
handle these scenarios. A neat trick: using extra channels for parallel processing within one track.
Example: one track could carry both a dry and wet signal in different channel pairs, then mix them. This
is advanced, but shows the depth of Reaper’s routing (used sometimes in mid/side encoding, etc.).
- External Sends (ReaRoute / Hardware Outputs): If you have outboard gear or want to integrate with
other software, Reaper’s routing extends outside the DAW. You can use Hardware Output on tracks to
send audio out to physical outputs (to hardware effects or monitors). If you loop back external
processing, you’ll need to manage latency (ReaInsert plugin helps to ping and compensate latency for
hardware FX). Also, Reaper’s ReaRoute (Windows) or Rearoute-like JACK on Linux can send audio/midi to
other software. This is a niche topic, but as you become a power user, you might route audio to a
mastering suite or a visualizer in real-time. Just be aware that it’s possible.
- Routing Matrix and View: Use the Routing Matrix view (View menu) to see a grid of all sends and
hardware outs. It’s a big picture of your signal flow. At first it might look overwhelming in a large
project, but it’s a convenient way to create or troubleshoot routing. You can click on the matrix to add
sends or see at a glance “why am I hearing double audio? oh, a track still has parent send plus a send to
another bus causing duplication.” Get comfortable using it as a diagnostic tool. Also note each track’s
routing panel (the “IO” button) clearly lists all sends/receives and hardware outs for that track, which
helps in verifying connections.
Practical Exercises:
- Parallel Compression Bus: Take your drum tracks (or a single drum loop). Create a send from the
drum track(s) to a new track called “Drum Parallel” and put a compressor on “Drum Parallel” track.
Squash it heavily (high ratio, low threshold). Now blend that underneath the original drums by adjusting
the “Drum Parallel” track volume. This is parallel compression done via routing. Mute/unmute the
parallel track to hear the added punch and body it gives . This exercise reinforces send usage and
creative routing for mix benefit.
- Wet/Dry FX Bus: Suppose you want to add distortion to vocals but only blend a bit. Instead of using
the mix knob in a plugin, try this: duplicate the vocal track (or send it to a new track), put a distortion
plugin 100% wet on the new track, then mix that track in at low level. This is parallel distortion. Compare
with just inserting the plugin and using its mix knob; you might find the routing method more flexible
(e.g., you can EQ the distorted signal differently). This trains you to think of any effect in parallel terms,
not just compression. Reaper makes it easy to duplicate or send audio to create such parallel chains.
- Subgroup Processing: Create a subgroup for a set of instruments and process it. For example, route
all your backing vocals to a “BVox Bus” track. Then insert an EQ on that bus to collectively tame a
frequency (maybe cut 300 Hz if they’re muddy as a group). Also try a reverb on the bus versus individual
sends to reverb – notice the difference (reverb on bus means they all go into one reverb together,
potentially sounding more unified, whereas individual sends keep them a bit separate in the reverb).
This shows how grouping alters the sonic result and how you can choose where to place FX (on
individuals vs on the group).
- Sidechain a Pad with a Kick (Trance Gate): If you have a sustained pad sound, use the kick (or any
rhythmic element) to duck it. Setup sidechain compression as described: pad track with ReaComp (Aux
input), kick sending to pad’s 3/4. Set fast attack, medium release so the pad “pumps” with the kick. This
is common in EDM to make space for the kick and create a pulsing effect. Tweak to taste. Now, go a step
62
62
19
further: sidechain an EQ – e.g., have the vocal trigger a dynamic EQ on a guitar bus to carve space when
vocal is present (with a plugin like TDR Nova or ReaComp’s frequency dependent mode). This is
advanced but extremely useful: “ducking EQ” can clear mixes nicely (like automatic scooping of mids in
guitars when vocal sings).
- Challenge – Complex Route Setup: Design a scenario and implement it: e.g., “I want to send my
snare to both a plate reverb and a delay, but I want the delay repeats to go into the reverb too.” In
Reaper, you could send Snare -> Reverb, Snare -> Delay, and then Delay -> Reverb as well. Try something
like that to test your understanding. Another: “I want to apply a stereo widener to everything except
bass and kick.” You could route all other tracks to a bus, apply widener there, and keep bass/kick out of
it. These thought experiments force you to use combinations of sends, excludes (not sending some
tracks), and possibly creative use of channel routing (like using multichannel to separate mid/side
signals). Even if you don’t need such things now, the practice will give you confidence to route anything
you dream up later.
- Use the Routing Matrix: Finally, open the Routing Matrix after doing the above setups. Locate the
intersections that represent your sends/buses. It should show dots or numbers where routing exists
(like Kick -> Bass on 3/4, etc.). Verify it matches what you intended. This is how you’ll debug issues in
future (e.g., if you accidentally create a feedback loop, Reaper will warn you but you can see it in the
matrix). Try enabling View > Mixer > Layouts > Routing Matrix as a separate window so you can keep an eye
on it while adjusting. This will cement your understanding that the matrix is just a map of what you did
manually via track sends.
Useful Resources:
- Reaper User Guide – Routing Chapter: The manual explains all routing possibilities in detail,
including diagrams of signal flow. It’s worth reading the section on Routing/Grouping Matrix and Track
Channels to solidify concepts like channel mapping in sends . Also, the manual’s explanation of
folder tracks and how they route audio upward to the parent is enlightening (it’s basically auto-routing).
- Official Videos – “Sends & Busses” and “Folders”: As listed on the Reaper site , there are videos
specifically about Sends & Busses and about using Folders. These will visually demonstrate how to
create submixes and use sends. If anything in our text exercise felt confusing, these videos will likely
clear it up by example.
- Blog Tutorials on Sidechaining: Many tutorials exist on sidechain compression in Reaper, since it’s
slightly different in setup than some DAWs (because of the need to route to 3/4). A quick search for
“Reaper sidechain compression” yields step-by-step guides. Also, Kenny’s videos might cover it in
context (for example, in a mixing series he might sidechain the bass). Make sure to master this from at
least one video or article, as sidechaining is used frequently.
- The REAPER Blog – “Understanding REAPER’s Routing” Articles: There are some older but good blog
posts that explain concepts like “How to create a Headphone mix in Reaper” (using sends), or using
ReaInsert for hardware – these applied scenarios can deepen your understanding. Jon (Reaper Blog)
also had content on using Rearoute and complex MIDI routing. It might be more than you need now,
but just know his site is a great resource if you think “Can Reaper do X routing thing?” The answer is
usually yes, and someone likely wrote about it.
- Community Forums and Templates: On the Reaper forum, many users share project templates or
track templates for complex setups (like drum recording templates with multi-outs, sidechain setups,
etc.). Studying these templates can teach you routing. For example, a popular template is a drum
instrument routed to multiple tracks (kick, snare, etc.) – by loading it, you can inspect how the routing is
configured (often a VSTi with multiple outputs sending to child tracks). Don’t hesitate to download some
templates from the Reaper Stash or forum and reverse-engineer the routing for learning.
Optional Advanced Topics (for later):
- ReaSurround and Ambisonics: If you venture into surround sound mixing or VR/ambisonics audio,
Reaper has plugins like ReaSurround (for positioning sounds in multi-channel field) and Ambisonic
50 63
64
20
toolsets (through community JSFX). These involve routing tracks to more than 2 channels and decoding
to speaker setups. It’s a specialized domain, but good to know Reaper can handle film/game audio
spatial mixes.
- ReaRoute for Virtual Audio Cables: On Windows, ReaRoute can act as virtual ASIO channels between
Reaper and other software. On macOS, you can use Jack or Blackhole, etc. If someday you want to use
two DAWs together (say Reaper and Ableton Live simultaneously), you can route audio/MIDI between
them. This is advanced and sometimes finicky, but feasible. Some producers use Reaper as a mixer for
hardware synths, routing into Ableton, etc. The knowledge from Stage 8 makes such undertakings
possible.
- Complex MIDI Routing: We’ve focused on audio routing, but MIDI routing is just as flexible. You can
send MIDI from one track to another, route different MIDI channels to different instruments, or use
virtual MIDI buses. If you do multi-timbral instruments (like Kontakt with 16 channels), you’ll get into
sending MIDI on channel 2 to play violins, etc., and receiving audio from it on separate outs. That’s both
MIDI and audio routing combined. When you find the need, look up “Reaper multi-out VSTi setup” –
many tutorials exist. It’s highly recommended to gradually learn this if you plan on using orchestral
libraries or drum VSTs, because setting up a single instance serving many tracks is efficient.
- Monitoring and Cue Mixes: For recording scenarios, you might route differently for monitor mixes
(e.g., send a hotter mix to headphones). Reaper can create cue sends (pre-fader sends to an output). As
an advanced case, imagine recording a band where each member wants a different headphone mix –
you could set up multiple bus mixes and route them to different hardware outputs. It’s complicated, but
Reaper can manage it. If you go deeper into recording engineering, keep in mind to learn Reaper’s
monitor mix techniques (SWS even has a cue buss generator).
- Preventing Feedback Loops: Reaper by default does not allow feedback routing (a track sending to
itself indirectly), but you can force it (there’s an option to allow feedback routing). With great power
comes responsibility – if you ever turn that on for creative feedback loops (say, feedback delay
networks), be cautious. Advanced sound design sometimes uses intentional feedback in routing (like
looping back an aux send). It can produce unique effects but also ear-splitting noise if not controlled.
Explore that only when you’re very comfortable with gain staging and perhaps after reading up on safe
practices for feedback loops.
Stage 9: Mastering Basics
Mastering is the final polish of a mixed track, bringing it to distribution-ready loudness and tonal
balance, and ensuring consistency across an album or playlist. In this stage, you will learn how to
perform a basic mastering process within Reaper on your finished mix or project. While professional
mastering is an art of its own, as a producer it’s valuable to know how to do a solid self-master for
demos or understanding what the process entails. By the end, you should be able to take a stereo mix
and apply final EQ, compression/limiting, and export it in the desired format.
Core Topics:
- Preparing the Mix for Mastering: Ideally, your mix should have headroom (peaks around -6 dBFS,
not clipping). If you’re mastering a single song in the same project, ensure your master track fader is at
0 and no clipping occurs. If you plan to master in a separate project, render your mix to a high-quality
WAV (24-bit or 32-bit float) at the project sample rate. Import that into a new Reaper project for
mastering (this separation can help you focus on mastering steps without the clutter of the mix project).
- Mastering Chain Order: A typical simple mastering chain might be: EQ -> Compression ->
(Saturation) -> Limiter. EQ to address any tonal imbalances (e.g., if the mix is too bright or boomy
overall, small adjustments here), Compression to glue the track and tame macro dynamics (with low
ratio like 1.2:1 to 1.5:1, slow attack, auto or medium release, just 1-2 dB gain reduction for gentle
21
control), optional Saturation or tape sim to add warmth or tame transients, and a final Limiter to raise
loudness to target level while preventing clipping.
- Using ReaEQ for Mastering: Use a linear phase EQ if available (ReaEQ is minimum phase; ReaFIR in EQ
mode can do linear phase if needed, or some third-party linear EQs). But for minor tweaks, ReaEQ is
fine. Typical moves: high-pass at ~20-30 Hz to remove subsonic rumble (unless your music needs sub
bass), maybe a slight cut or boost in broad ranges (e.g., a dip around 200-300 Hz if mix is muddy, a
gentle shelf boost at 10 kHz for “air” if it’s dull). Keep changes subtle (±1-2 dB) – mastering EQ is often
about small broad moves.
- Mastering Compression: If you use ReaComp, set it to a low ratio and maybe use auto-release for a
transparent result. You might compress only a little, aiming to reduce dynamic range by a small amount
(or sometimes not at all if the mix is already controlled). The goal is to add a touch of cohesion. Some
mastering engineers forego compression and just use a limiter, but a light compressor can add flavor
(especially if it has a nice analog modeling – ReaComp is clean, but you can explore gentle settings or a
third-party mastering compressor for color).
- Limiting and Loudness: The limiter is critical to achieving final loudness. Reaper doesn’t have a
dedicated flashy limiter, but JS: Master Limiter or Event Horizon (from SWS) or the included ReaLimit
(if available in your version) can do the job. Set the output ceiling to around -1.0 dB True Peak (to avoid
inter-sample clips on MP3/AAC encoding). Adjust the threshold so that the loudest parts of the song hit
the desired loudness. Use loudness meter (Reaper’s JS: Loudness Meter) to measure integrated LUFS.
Depending on genre/platform: -14 LUFS is common for streaming normalization, but many masters are
louder (e.g., -10 to -8 LUFS for pop). For learning, aim maybe -12 LUFS as a compromise – loud but not
smashed. Listen for distortion or pumping as you lower threshold (if it sounds bad, back off or the mix
might need changes). This is the delicate part – balancing loudness vs. quality.
- Stereo Imaging (Optional): If your mix is a bit narrow or has low-frequency stereo issues, you might
use an imaging tool. Reaper’s stock doesn’t have a dedicated imager, but you can do mid-side
processing by encoding to MS (JSFX encoder) then EQing or widening highs on the side channel. Or use
a free imager plugin to widen above a certain freq. This is advanced mastering move – use sparingly to
avoid phase problems. Often, if the mix was good, you might not need this at all.
- Mastering Utilities: Use tools like SPAN (free spectrum analyzer) to visualize the frequency content,
or the loudness meter to ensure compliance. Reaper’s loudness meter can also help you match levels if
you’re mastering multiple tracks – you’d want them to have a consistent loudness and tone from track
to track.
- Dithering: If you are outputting to 16-bit (for CD or certain distribution), apply dither on the final
render (Reaper’s render dialog has a dither option). If staying 24-bit for digital release, dithering is less
crucial, but it doesn’t hurt to dither whenever reducing bit depth. Reaper provides several noise shaping
options. Just remember, do it only once at the very end.
- Mastering Multiple Tracks (Album Sequencing): If you have multiple songs, you can arrange them
sequentially in one Reaper project (each song’s file on the timeline, separated by gaps). You can then
adjust each with its own FX or item/take FX. Reaper’s region render matrix is handy to output each
region (song) as a separate file. For basic album mastering: make sure the loudness and EQ profile of
songs feel coherent, adjust song spacing (crossfades if needed), and render each with appropriate track
names/metadata (Reaper can tag WAV/BWF or render to FLAC, etc., with metadata). This is beyond a
single song scenario but good to know you can master an EP’s sequence in Reaper.
Practical Exercises:
- Master Your Mixed Track: Take the mix you finished in Stage 6 or 7. Start a fresh project with that
stereo file. Set up a mastering chain: ReaEQ -> ReaComp -> JS Master Limiter (or a limiter of your
choice). Adjust EQ gently to see if you can improve the tonal balance – compare toggling it on/off. Then
set ReaComp as described (maybe threshold so gain reduction is just a couple dB on peaks). Then
adjust limiter for loudness. Compare the unmastered vs mastered by bypassing all FX – notice how
mastered is louder and maybe slightly tighter in dynamics. Ensure you’re not introducing obvious
22
distortion or pumping – if you are, ease off settings. This is basic mastering on your own mix.
- Reference Comparison: Import a reference track into this mastering project (bypass its master chain,
it’s already mastered). Level-match your mix (before limiting) to the reference by ear (turn down the
reference or your track so they’re about equal loudness). Compare frequency spectrum and punch.
After mastering, compare again. Did you get closer in brightness or loudness? Use SPAN or Reaper’s
spectrogram (in master track, you can enable spectrograph view) to visually compare frequency
content. This can highlight if your track lacks sub bass or has too much midrange, etc., guiding your EQ
moves.
- Test Output Formats: Try rendering your mastered track to different formats: WAV 16-bit, MP3
320kbps, FLAC. Listen to them (particularly MP3) to ensure the encoding didn’t introduce issues. Reaper
uses the LAME encoder for MP3 – at high bitrates it should be fine. It’s good to know how to export both
high quality for archives (WAV/FLAC) and delivery format (MP3 for demos, or whatever needed). Check
that your metadata (artist, title, etc.) can be added in the render dialog for certain formats.
- Alternate Mastering Approach (Use a Suite): Just for learning, try a demo of a dedicated mastering
plugin or suite (like iZotope Ozone which often has a free trial, or a free all-in-one like T-Racks CS free).
Apply it to your mix and experiment with its modules (EQ, exciter, widener, limiter, etc.). While Reaper’s
native tools are great, using a suite designed for mastering might introduce you to common workflows
and features (like multiband compression, dynamic EQ, etc.). Don’t rely solely on any “auto-master”
presets, but see how they affect the sound. You might learn, for example, how a multiband compressor
can tame just the low-end dynamics or how an exciter adds harmonics to make a mix brighter. You can
attempt similar with ReaPlugs if needed (e.g., splitting bands via crossover JSFX and compress each).
This is a more experimental exercise to broaden your understanding of mastering techniques.
- Loudness Penalty Check: After mastering, use an online Loudness Penalty analyzer (or the plugin if
you have it) or simply note your integrated LUFS and peaks. Many streaming services normalize to
around -14 LUFS. If your master is hotter, they’ll turn it down. That’s okay as long as it still sounds good
when turned down. As a quick check, replay your master and simply lower the Reaper master fader by
the “penalty” amount (if you estimate say -5 dB for Spotify). Does it still punch nicely? If overly squashed
dynamics, maybe you over-limited. This is just a conceptual check to avoid the new producer mistake of
chasing loudness at the expense of quality. Finding that balance is part of mastering skill.
Useful Resources:
- Reaper Blog – Mastering in Reaper tutorials: Look for articles or videos titled “Mastering with
Reaper’s stock plugins” or similar. There are a few out there showing how to use ReaEQ, ReaComp,
ReaXcomp (the multiband compressor), ReaLimit, etc., for a mastering chain. The Reaper Blog has also
covered how to render multiple songs with region matrix, adding track metadata, etc., for more
advanced mastering tasks.
- Ian Shepherd’s Mastering Advice: Ian Shepherd (a mastering engineer) has a lot of content on
mastering basics, loudness, and tools. While not Reaper-specific, his tips on “landmine frequencies” or
“how to use a loudness meter” are very valuable. Also, his Perception AB plugin is great for levelmatching master vs unmastered (though a simple bypass and fader adjust can suffice). His blog and
YouTube (Production Advice) are good resources to get the mindset of mastering (e.g., being subtle,
thinking about the listening environment differences, etc.).
- Books/Courses on Mastering: If you want to dive deeper, books like Bob Katz’s Mastering Audio are
the definitive resources. They’re heavy reading but worth it if mastering intrigues you. Specific to
Reaper, there may be courses on platforms like Udemy or Lynda focusing on mastering in Reaper –
could be worth a look for a structured approach.
- Forums (Mastering Section): The Reaper forum likely has threads on mastering workflow. Gearspace
forum has a mastering section (caution: can be opinionated, but there’s knowledge there). You can ask
for advice on your mastering chain on r/Reaper or r/audioengineering – people could suggest
improvements (like “try a slower attack on the comp” or “use a brickwall like LoudMax instead of that JS
limiter” etc.). Just remember in mastering, subtlety and understanding your tools is key – avoid chasing
23
the latest plugin magic bullet; focus on listening critically.
- Tools for Quality Control: There are free tools like TB_proAudio dpMeter (for LUFS), Youlean Loudness
Meter (free version), and MAAT DROffline (for measuring DR – dynamic range). Consider using one to
analyze your masters. Also, something like Voxengo SPAN (spectrum) as mentioned, and even the JSFX
Spectrogram for frequency vs time. These help you verify that, for example, there’s no rogue sub-bass
hit or a weird high frequency spike. Mastering is often about catching those last details.
Optional Advanced Topics (for later):
- Advanced Mastering Processes: Eventually you might explore multiband compression (ReaXcomp is
Reaper’s multiband comp) to control specific frequency bands’ dynamics, dynamic EQ (automating EQ
or using a dynamic EQ plugin to cut/boost only when certain frequencies get loud), stereo widening by
Mid-Side EQ or Haas delay (careful with those), and advanced limiters with lookahead and multiband
limiting. These can solve specific problems but also can harm the sound if misused – tread carefully, use
your ears.
- DDP and CD Authoring: If you ever need to deliver a DDP image for CD replication, there are
extensions (like the open-source ReaBurn or third-party tools) that can integrate with Reaper for that.
Not common nowadays unless you’re printing CDs, but good to know Reaper can support that workflow
through plugins/scripts.
- Mastering for Vinyl or Other Formats: Different mediums have different considerations (vinyl has
bass mono compatibility needs, etc.). If you find yourself targeting such formats, research those
specifics. Reaper’s toolset is capable (you might use a mid-side technique to mono the bass below
100Hz for vinyl, for example). It’s an advanced mastering topic but could be relevant if you ever plan a
vinyl release of your music.
- Batch Mastering and Loudness Normalization: Reaper can batch process multiple files. For
instance, you can set up a batch process to normalize a bunch of tracks to a certain LUFS or to apply the
same FX chain to many files. This is useful if you have stems or want to quickly generate instrumental
versions of a master (applying same processing minus vocals). SWS also has loudness actions to
normalize items to target LUFS. Advanced use of these tools can speed up mastering tasks when
dealing with collections of tracks.
- Continuous Learning and Reference Monitoring: Mastering is a field where critical listening is
paramount. As an advanced pursuit, invest time in ear training – learn to recognize frequency bands by
ear, understand translation to different playback systems (test your masters in car, earbuds, big
speakers, etc.), and keep referencing commercial tracks. Also, consider using calibration software (like
Sonarworks SoundID) if your room/headphones aren’t flat, to get more reliable listening environment.
Although not a Reaper technique per se, it significantly impacts the quality of your mastering decisions.
Stage 10: Customization, Scripting, and Workflow Optimization
in Reaper
Having covered all major production skills, this final stage focuses on making Reaper your perfect
workstation. Reaper’s flexibility allows deep customization – from simple GUI tweaks to writing scripts
that add new features. In this stage, you’ll explore ways to tailor the DAW to your workflow, speeding up
your productivity and unlocking advanced capabilities through the community’s extensions. The
outcome is that you not only know how to use Reaper, but you can bend it to work exactly the way you
want for maximum efficiency.
Core Topics:
- Custom Actions and Keybindings: Reaper’s Actions list (hit ? to open it) contains every command.
You can assign keyboard shortcuts to any action or sequence of actions (custom actions) . 65 66
24
Identify repetitive tasks you do and see if there’s an action for them. For example, if you often split
items and add a fade, you could make a custom action that does “Split item under cursor + fade edges”.
Or assign a single key to “Trim item to selection”. Practice making a simple custom action: open Actions,
click New..., add a couple of actions in sequence, save it, and bind to a key. Test it out. This is the
gateway to massive workflow boosts. Some popular custom actions are provided by SWS (like create
region from selection, etc.) – once SWS is installed (see below), you’ll have even more available.
- Themes and GUI Adjustments: Reaper’s default theme is functional, but you might prefer a different
look. Try downloading a popular theme (e.g., Reaper 6 Default Commala mod, or Hydra theme, or Smooth
theme). Installing a theme is as simple as downloading the ReaperThemeZip file and double-clicking it
(or placing in ColorThemes folder). Explore the Options > Themes menu and the theme adjuster script
that comes with Reaper for v6/v7 (lets you tweak element sizes, colors if the theme supports it). A wellchosen theme can improve visibility of important elements (for instance, some themes highlight armed
tracks or have bolder waveforms). It’s personal preference, but since you’ll spend hours in Reaper, find a
theme that is comfortable for your eyes and mental model.
- SWS Extension: Install the SWS Extensions . This is an unofficial add-on that adds hundreds of
actions and features (like loudness analysis, snapshots, groove tools, etc.). For example, SWS Snapshots
let you save mixes or FX states and recall them, SWS Auto Color can automatically color tracks by name
or type (nice for organization) . After installing, skim the SWS section of the manual or a list of
actions to be aware of what’s possible. One handy SWS feature: Resource Lists (you can keep banks of FX
chains, track templates, etc., in a window for quick access). Another: Marker List and Region Playlist for
advanced arrangement. SWS is a must-have for power users – it’s safe to install early on, even if you
don’t use it immediately .
- ReaPack Package Manager: Install ReaPack . This is a package manager for Reaper that gives you
access to a vast repository of user-created scripts, effects, themes, etc. With ReaPack, you can browse
and install scripts directly from within Reaper, and keep them updated. For instance, you’ll find scripts
for things like “quantize MIDI to groove”, “item louder/softer steps”, “explode multichannel audio to
tracks”, and much more. After installing, synchronize packages, then peruse the Browse Packages
window. You can search by keyword. Install a couple of popular ones (e.g., loudness graph, MIDI scale
finder, track wiring diagram, etc.) to see how they integrate (most scripts become actions you can bind to
keys or buttons). This extends Reaper far beyond its stock capabilities and lets you customize it to an
incredible degree.
- Toolbars and Mouse Modifiers: Customize your toolbars with your most-used actions or scripts. For
example, you could create a toolbar for MIDI editing with buttons to transpose ±12, humanize, etc., or a
toolbar for recording with buttons to toggle preroll, metronome, etc. Right-click an empty toolbar area
and choose Customize. You can add actions to the toolbar as buttons (even with custom icons). Similarly,
explore Mouse Modifiers in Preferences – you can alter what different mouse+key combos do. For
instance, you might set “Alt+drag on an item edge” to timestretch (which might already be default) or
change “Double-click item” to open MIDI editor in a specific mode. Be careful not to stray too far from
defaults until you’re sure (since tutorials assume defaults), but if something annoys you or could be
streamlined, chances are you can adjust it.
- ReaScript (Lua, EEL, Python): If you have programming inclination, Reaper allows scripting in Lua
(and also EEL, a C-like script, or Python with setup). You can automate tasks or create new functionality.
Start by looking at existing scripts (ReaPack ones or sample scripts) and perhaps tweak them. A simple
first script could be one that, say, randomizes volume of selected items subtly, or exports all regions to
separate files with a certain naming scheme. The Reaper API documentation is available and there’s a
forum section for Q&A. Writing a script might be overkill for many, because so many are already shared
via ReaPack, but for those niche needs, it’s empowering. Even if you don’t code, understanding that
scripts are what underlie many custom actions can demystify things and allow you to troubleshoot or
slightly customize them.
- SWS Cycle Actions: A feature in SWS is Cycle Actions, which can create conditional or toggled actions
(like one button that toggles between two states, running different commands). This is advanced, but
67
29
68
67
25
one example use: a single key to toggle metronome on if off, or off if on (without having to have two
separate shortcuts). Cycle actions can also do sequences with conditions (like if record mode = normal,
set to autopunch, else set to normal). This can achieve logic that vanilla custom actions can’t. If you find
yourself thinking “I wish one key did X when in mode A and Y when in mode B,” cycle actions might be
the answer. Not mandatory, but know it exists if you get into heavy customization.
- Workflow Templates and Defaults: As you refine your workflow, create project templates and track
templates to avoid reinventing the wheel. For instance, make a default project template that has your
favorite tracks already set up (e.g., a folder for drums with 8 tracks inside, a couple of FX return tracks
for reverb/delay, maybe a sidechain routing if you always use one). Set that as the default new project
(in Preferences > Project). Also save track templates for instruments or setups you use often (like a vocal
track with your go-to FX chain, or a guitar tracking chain with amp sim and noise gate). Then you can
add those with two clicks whenever needed. This encapsulates your customizations into re-usable
chunks. Over time, build a library of these templates for various scenarios (podcast template, full band
template, orchestral template, etc.). It will drastically cut setup time when inspiration strikes.
Practical Exercises:
- Customize a Shortcut: Think of one operation you do frequently that doesn’t have a single key
shortcut yet. For example, “glue items” or “toggle metronome” or “zoom to selection”. Go to Actions
( ? ), find that action, and assign it to an unused key or a chord (like Ctrl+Shift+M for metronome
perhaps). Test the shortcut. Once you see how easy it is, add a few more that make sense to you (avoid
overwriting keys you already use often, unless you’re sure). You could also create a custom action like
“Save + Increment project version number” (there are scripts for that). Over a week of usage, note every
time you wish “there was a faster way” and then see if you can create it via actions. This iterative
improvement is the heart of customizing Reaper – a month later, your workflow will be much smoother
than initially.
- Install SWS and ReaPack: If not done, install these. After installing ReaPack, use it to find and install
at least 3 scripts that sound intriguing. Example: search “select notes” – you might find scripts to select
every other MIDI note or highest note in chord, etc. Install it, then find it in Actions and try it out in a
MIDI editor. Or search “loudness” and try a script that normalizes item volume to -23 LUFS. By actively
using these community tools, you get a feel for how much is available. Also try an SWS feature like
snapshots: set up a mix, then use SWS Snapshots window to save the mix, then mess up the mix and
recall the snapshot to see it revert – neat, right? This exercise ensures you know the power of these
extensions.
- Add a Toolbar Button: Create a custom toolbar or modify an existing one. For practice, add a button
that toggles the visibility of the mixer (Action “View: Toggle Mixer visible”). Choose an icon (Reaper
provides some, or you can leave text label). Now you have a clickable button for it. Add another for
something like opening performance meter. If you use certain scripts often, putting them on a toolbar
can be handy (some scripts even provide toolbar icons). Maybe make a toolbar for editing with icons for
common tasks (cut, copy, slip edit tool, etc.) if that suits you. Once done, dock the toolbar somewhere
convenient. This is your own mini control panel – design it as you see fit.
- Tweak a Mouse Modifier: Go to Preferences > Mouse Modifiers. One popular tweak: set right-drag in
the arrange view to “marquee select items (middle-click to drag)”. By default Reaper uses right-drag for
a marquee time selection IIRC. Some like to make it select items or select time + items. Try changing
one modifier and testing it out (e.g., Alt+right drag to scrub, or double-click on empty area to stop
playback – just examples). If you find no need now, it’s okay, but at least explore the options. You might
spot something like “Media item fade fade-in curve: ctrl+drag” and realize “oh I can change fade curve
by dragging with ctrl, cool”.
- Hello World Script: If you’re up for it, open the Action “ReaScript: New script”. Choose Lua. It’ll open an
editor. Copy-paste a simple example from the Reaper forum or ReaScript documentation (like a script
that pops up a dialog “Hello World” or moves selected item one track down). Run it. If it works,
congratulations, you ran a script you wrote (or copied)! If you know programming, try altering it
26
(change the message, or loop through selected tracks to do something simple). If coding isn’t your
thing, you can skip, but often non-programmers find they can handle small Lua scripts to automate
stuff when needed. Even understanding how to tweak others’ scripts (like changing a threshold value in
a script that does batch fades) can be valuable.
Useful Resources:
- Reaper User Guide – Customization Chapter: The manual has sections on custom actions, toolbars,
mouse modifiers, etc. It’s a good reference if you’re not sure how to do something (like “how to import a
custom toolbar icon”).
- Reapertips & Reaper Blog – Customization Posts: Alejandro (Reapertips) often shares tips on
customization. For example, “6 things I wish I knew when I started using Reaper” might cover some
custom workflow ideas . Reaper Blog has videos on SWS extensions, top scripts from ReaPack, and
how to tweak themes. Seek those out; you’ll often find “I didn’t know Reaper could do that!” moments.
- Reaper Stash and Forum: The Stash (stash.reaper.fm) is where users upload themes, icons, project
templates, etc. Browse it for highly-rated themes – there are themes mimicking other DAWs (Pro Tools,
Ableton) if you prefer those looks, or ones designed for specific purposes (dark themes for low light,
high contrast for vision impairments, large text for hi-DPI, etc.). The forum’s Scripts & JSFX subforum is
very active – if you have a script idea, search there; likely someone has made it. If not, you can even
request it – the Reaper scripting community is incredibly helpful, sometimes writing a script for you if
it’s simple and useful.
- Video Series – “Reaper Customization” (Kenny or others): Kenny Gioia has some older videos like
“Customizing Reaper” covering basics of actions, menus, toolbars. Those are helpful to watch once, to
get an overview of possibilities . Also, check out Adam Steel’s Reaper 101 on YouTube; he often
sprinkles workflow tips and might cover customizing in his newer series.
- SWS and ReaPack Documentation: SWS has an online manual highlighting major features. ReaPack’s
site lists popular repositories to add (though it comes with the main one by default, some script authors
have their own ReaPack repos you can add). For instance, Lokasenna’s Scripts or BirdBird’s, etc., might
need adding. Follow instructions on those if a tutorial mentions a script you can’t find – likely you need
to add the repository URL (which ReaPack makes easy under Manage Repositories). Keep ReaPack
synced (it can auto-sync on startup if you enable) so you get updates; script bugs get fixed and
improvements added regularly.
- ReaScript Help: If you dive into scripting, there’s a dev chat on the forum and even a Discord where
scripters hang out. The ReaTeam GitHub has tons of script examples. Also, consider using Lokasenna’s
ReaImGui if you want to make scripts with custom GUI – that’s an advanced frontier enabling you to
essentially build mini-plugins. Many of the fancy community tools (like interactive RC files or new UI
panels) are done via ReaScript + ImGui. Only for the truly adventurous, but just know that Reaper is
extensible enough that users have added entire new functionalities (like spectral editing improvements,
or a chord helper tool, etc.) through scripts.
Optional Advanced Topics:
- Custom Extensions (ReaPlug development): If scripting isn’t enough, one can write C++ extensions
(like SWS itself is an extension). This is hardcore programming and beyond most users’ needs, but if you
have the skills and a grand idea, you can extend Reaper at a very low-level. The SDK is available on the
Cockos website.
- JSFX Programming: Reaper includes the JSFX (Jesusonic FX) language for writing audio/MIDI effects
(essentially DSP scripting). You can create your own audio effects or MIDI manipulators. It’s text-based
and real-time, great for prototyping or making a very custom tool (like a specific filter or a MIDI filter
that does something unusual). The community has produced hundreds of JSFX (many included with
Reaper or via ReaPack). If you’re into sound design or want to learn DSP, writing a JSFX (like a distortion
or delay or even synth) is educational and rewarding. There’s a JSFX programming guide on the Reaper
site .
69
65
70
27
- Osc and Web Control: Reaper can be controlled via OSC (Open Sound Control) or through the web
interface. For instance, you can use a smartphone/tablet to control Reaper with a custom layout (adjust
faders via OSC, etc.). Setting this up involves configuring Control Surfaces. It’s advanced but can be very
useful for remote control (like recording yourself in another room). Similarly, the Web Interface feature
can turn Reaper into a server that you connect to with a browser to perform basic actions (cool for
using your phone as a transport control, for example). Explore these if you have a specific need like
that.
- Advanced Themes (Walter coding): If simply downloading themes isn’t enough and you want to
tweak layouts drastically, Reaper’s themes can be edited via a language called WALTER. This is how you
reposition UI elements, change their size behavior, etc. It’s akin to coding a UI skin. There’s
documentation and a forum section for theming. It’s not for everyone, but if you enjoy pixel-perfect
customization, you could modify an existing theme or create your own unique look that displays things
exactly to your liking.
- Collaborative and Network Tools: Reaper has some capabilities for collaborative work, like the
NINJAM plugin for online jam sessions (built-in). There’s also an ability to sync Reaper instances via MIDI
clock or LTC if working with others in different DAWs. And projects can be saved in human-readable
format (RPP is text) which some use with version control (Git) for collaboration. These are niche
advanced uses, but mentionable to show Reaper’s openness. If one day you plan to work remotely with
a band or keep version control on your projects, Reaper won’t stop you – in fact, some users have
workflows with GIT where they merge changes on RPP files. It requires discipline, but doable due to the
text file nature of projects.
- Staying Up-to-date: Finally, an advanced topic is simply keeping up with Reaper’s updates. The
software updates frequently with new features and fixes. As a power user, you might follow the prerelease forum where new builds are tested (only if you like living on the edge). You can also participate
in feature request discussions. Cockos listens to user feedback closely – many features today started as
user requests. By staying engaged with the community and updates, you ensure you’re leveraging the
latest tools. For instance, track wiring view or spectral edits or razor editing – these were added in
recent versions; knowing about them as they come can influence your workflow positively. So, treat
learning Reaper as an ongoing process. Even after mastering it, there’s always a new trick or feature
around the corner in this DAW.
Conclusion: You now have a comprehensive roadmap from the very basics of Reaper to its most
advanced customization. By following these stages, doing the exercises, and utilizing the resources
provided, you will progressively build competence in recording, editing, MIDI programming, mixing,
mastering, and optimizing Reaper for your personal workflow. Remember that mastery comes with
practice and iteration: revisit earlier stages as needed (for example, you might record more complex
sources later or refine your mixing as your ears develop). The Reaper community and documentation
are always there to help when you encounter something new or challenging – no question is too small,
as every expert user was a beginner once.
Reaper’s depth is immense, but that is its strength: as you grow, it grows with you. Take pride in the
projects you complete at each stage (save them to look back on your progress), and most importantly,
keep a creative mindset. After all, the purpose of learning Reaper inside-out is to remove technical
barriers between you and making great music. With this roadmap, a bit of patience, and a lot of handson experimentation, you’ll find yourself becoming not just a Reaper power user, but a more confident
producer. Happy music making!
Sources:
• Official Reaper User Guide and Videos for structured feature overviews . 32 39
28
Reaper community insights on workflow and extensions .
Unison Audio’s Reaper guide for additional DAW feature explanations .
Reddit discussions from r/Reaper for practical beginner tips and learning approaches .
Cambridge Music Technology library for mixing practice resources .
If Reaper was your first DAW, how long did it take you to get
comfortable with using it? Any tips for a beginner that you wish you knew? : r/Reaper
https://www.reddit.com/r/Reaper/comments/1bnbjwo/if_reaper_was_your_first_daw_how_long_did_it_take/
I recently got Reaper, any tips for beginners? : r/Reaper
https://www.reddit.com/r/Reaper/comments/10jrb9r/i_recently_got_reaper_any_tips_for_beginners/
Learn Reaper DAW - Part 1
https://orchestralmusicschool.com/learn-reaper-daw-part-1/514
How To Record In REAPER (Step-by-Step Guide) - Pro Mix Academy
https://promixacademy.com/blog/how-to-record-in-reaper/
REAPER | Videos
https://www.reaper.fm/videos.php
REAPER | User Guide
https://www.reaper.fm/userguide.php
Reaper DAW 101: The Official Beginner’s
Guide To Using Reaper
https://unison.audio/reaper-daw/
What's the best way for me to get started with Reaper? : r/Reaper
https://www.reddit.com/r/Reaper/comments/1b475ag/whats_the_best_way_for_me_to_get_started_with/
How to Use Reaper Automation and Envelopes | Envato Tuts+
https://music.tutsplus.com/how-to-use-reaper-automation-and-envelopes--cms-107723t
Reapertips | Learn all things REAPER DAW
https://www.reapertips.com/
Cambridge-MT
https://www.cambridge-mt.co.uk/
A Guide to Automation Items in REAPER - Reapertips
https://www.reapertips.com/post/a-guide-to-automation-items-in-reaper
Understanding REAPER Automation Transitions
https://reaper.blog/2022/05/automation-transitions/
• 67 29
• 50 71
• 2 30
• 51
1 2 11 18 22 25 29 61 66 67 68
3 30 31
4 5 6 12 13 14 15
7 8 9 27 28
10 17 26 32 33 37 41 42 44 45 48 52 53 57 59 64
16 47 70
19 20 21 34 35 36 39 40 43 49 50 55 56 62 63 65 71
23 24 54
38
46 69
51
58
60
29